5 Best place in town , just open today , fries are awesome , any burger you grab is the best, you can't go wrong , they start in Austin Texas and moving down to Los Angeles can't wait
5 Fun place! - Our waitress's T-shirt said "We spank our patties and they like it! " One of the drinks is called "Lil' Prick" which is a sassy prickly pear martini with tequila.  We had the Goodnight Angus Beef burger with grilled onion and the sauces on the side.  It was cooked just like we requested. The side of fries was very tasty.  All served on a metal tray. They have a variety of Angus beef burgers,  a Bison burger, a Lamb burger, Black Bean corn patty, sushi-grade Tuna, Turkey and Akaushi Beef with Brie Cheese and Aioli sauce.  The drink fountain promised healthier "cane sugar" drinks and even my diet coke tasted better than at other places.  They have organic kale, caesar,and spinach arugala salads   We will definitely be back to try the homemade custard ice cream shakes with tempting flavors like Caramel & sea salt, red velvet cake, nutella and chocolate pretzel. Two burgers, two drinks and a large fry about $26 for hormone and antibiotic free Angus beef. Buns are baked from scratch.   Hopdoddy means beer (hop) and doddy is nickname given to native cows of Aberdeen. Did I mention they have lots of beer choices?
5 Omgosh best burger in town. By far. The milkshakes are to die for. The atmosphere of the restaurant is great and the service was excellent. I can't wait to come back!
5 Epic experience ! 3 of us tried the - el diablo  - just as it sounds hot as heck burger!  Continental Club - best darn turkey burger EVER ! The Goodnight - amazing angus cheese burger with jalapeños & caramelized onions.   We shared 1/4 of the burgers and they were all so good to pick a fav.    The fires hands down awesome !
5 Impressive burger bar with healthy food options. Turkey burger was outstanding. My guess is that this place will be difficult to eat at due to popularity.
5 This is a really nice place.  The decor is great and the service is super friendly.  I had the poblano burger and it was cooked perfectly.  They have mostly local beers on tap and I enjoyed the two different IPAs that I tried last night.
5 Went back with wife and friends. I had the Japanese beef burger with Brie and caramelized onions. Outstanding! Wife had the poblano burger and loved it . Friends said best burger they've ever had . Shared the salted carmel milkshake for dessert . Outstanding service. Couldn't have had a better casual dining experience.
5 This is probably the best burger bar in AZ, possibly the west coast. El Diablo burger is out of this world, by far the best I've had in years. On their opening day it was really spicy, but hasn't been that spicy since then. Either way, they will try to scare you, but really it's not all that hot.   They picked such a great location and I suspect this place will continue to be as packed as it has been in the past few days since opening up. I love the decor and ambiance they got going there.  The fries are great as well. Very fresh and not overly salty. The only negative thing I have to say about this place is that they don't have traditional simple desserts. Who has room for a shake after a burger? I never understood that trend.  Also worth mentioning is the truly awesome customer service. I don't know if it's because they just opened, but it seems like they have A LOT of people working there. Which is great, they're all nice and eager to help you out.  Next I plan on trying other burger combinations as well as their grass-fed patties.
3 Full Service? Not really.  Assigned Seating? Yes.  Fast Food style line? Yes.  Tipping? Yes - jar with a reminder phrase about how tipping isn't just for cows.  Also the credit card slips have the tip line on them, but yet again this is clearly not a full service place.  Interesting.  The awkwardness started when we couldn't enter the building yet there were many open tables visible, and no apparent overcrowding inside.  They have a corral that starts outside with staff only allowing patrons in to where you find yourself paying for the 1st of multiple times - the first is a separate transaction in a standing line for your beer.  And sadly there are only Arizona beers on draft and the large size is only available in a big FROZEN schooner that you often see at old school Mexican restaurants.  After paying for the first time you continue through the line where another staff member gives you an assignment slip for your table.  Better not lose that!  And then you order at the register, pay a 2nd time, and proceed to find your assigned seat.  In my case it was 2 burgers, 2 fries for low $30's (excluding tip and excluding beer).  Shortly after this I found my beer glass empty and guess what - you must go back to the bar or find a roaming employee in your assigned seating area.  So make that a 3rd transaction for my visit.  I'm not making this stuff up.  When I thought it couldn't get much worse before I had even received my food I made the mistake of getting a nice tall glass of water from the unlabeled water dispenser which turned out to have cucumber and citrus juices in it too.  If you don't dig cucumbers, you understand the surprise.  But to make me feel better, I noticed all of the signs espousing the "support local" philosophy/religion and such, and for that reason I can see why they'll gain a lot of similarly minded consumers.     Food quality was in fact fairly good as far as burgers go and reminded me a lot of Smashburger, but then the inevitable comparisons of how they run the business came to mind.    In the end I find myself leaning in one of two separate directions. If I'm going to dish out this much money for burgers and beers I'd rather just be at a full service place.  Or, if I'm going to be corralled into standing lines and such then maybe I'd rather just be at a Smashburger-like place where the food is just as good but without the big dent in my wallet.
3 Just ok. Food was good, nothing spectacular, but not bad either. Lots of options and combinations, and they have gluten free buns and a veggie burger, so that was a plus.   Fries are above average, and the small touches, like the condiments and the soda were very well done.  However: vastly overpriced for what you get, and the restaurant is that particularly annoying combination of counter-service and servers. Basically you place your order and it comes to your table, but I wouldn't really call that full service, even if they do in theory refill your drinks.
1 Horrible! You would think that a place that prides themselves from being from Texas would have top quality meat. Not the case at this place. Save your money.
4 Veggie burger is for sure one of the best I've had, delish avocados and smeared with a cilantro sauce that was out of this world. As non-meat eater I definitely appreciate a home made veggie burger vice defrosted garden burger.  Hubs said his classic burger was very good but not unlike others he has had at burger focused restaurants.  To drink I went with the Caramel Sea Salt milkshake after 4 separate employees recommended it to me. A milkshake is something I order maybe one or two times a year and this one was so freaking good I can see myself packing on a few lbs just from wanting it again and again and again. Were talking rocks of sea salt in my mouth. Oh yes.   Fries were just right and spicy chipotle ketchup was a great accompaniment.  As for the line / corral nonsense, we arrived at 5PM for Saturday dinner so we really didn't wait, but by the time we left there were a good 30 people outside and at least 10 empty tables inside. I really had my doubts if Scottsdale peeps would line up at this place as I heard they do in TX .... Turns out they will but curious how long that will last. I can see your standard Scottsdale escalade driving frappucino drinking my-shit-don't-stink train wreck  group of guys trying to work the line here thinking they are all special and I don't think they will have much luck.   The "excuse" for the line is that you are waiting for a table to clear but it's pretty obvious they line you up to create an appearance of demand and exclusivity like a night club. You have to follow the rules like a good little sheep I mean customer or you won't get your delicious burger. Personally I find it annoying if tables are open I would rather wait at a table and chill with a drink vice lining up like cattle (Pun intended) but I have to give it to them it's a smart tactic and they are hustling you to buy a drink from the moment you walk up so they clearly have a lucrative setup. And considering I was balls deep in a $6 milkshake before I made it to the cashier to order their setup works. The only benefit is you don't have to play the game where some fat ass is saving a table for his friends who are still parking their cars and you are standing there like a schmuck with a tray of cold food waiting for a table to open.  I will definitely be back but if I see more then 10 people in that damn corral and can't snag a bar seat I will just go to smash burger.  I will try to stick to early dinners or lunch to avoid waiting needlessly. Time is clearly money here and I would prefer not to offer to much of either up if I can avoid it.  Everything was great and so was the service- based on the accents they must have brought TX employees in for the opening and I will be curious to see if local employees can keep the service levels as high.
5 This place is amazing. I'm a little embarrassed to say I've been 3 times in the last week. The first time my friend and I split the Llano Pablano burger and baby kale salad. AMAZING!   The second time another friend and I split the Greek lamb burger. It wasn't my favorite. But still pretty tasty.   Last night I went with my boyfriend and I got the seared ahi burger. It was so good I literally woke up thinking about it this morning ha.   Make sure you also get or split the Parmesan truffle fries. To. Die. For.   Moscow mules are awesome. Friendly staff (Love Milan) and fairly quick. I will definitely be returning again and probably again!
4 First impression was this place is kickin': line of folks outside, food looked good from the window, lots of awesome points. But then you notice the empty tables, and wonder why they dont seat the 25 minute line outside. They can take drink orders as you wait but once youre allowed inside, theres more of the same line to order your food. A server or hostess , I'm not sure who, walks up and asks how many we have and then says, "Im going to go find you a table and I'll be back." My impression is that this is really inefficient. People running back and forth trying to keep track with paper and pen where we can sit... I would consider getting an ipad or some electronic reader that people can mark off unavailable seats and it updates in real time.   We order, get our condiments,  and drinks, only to now go look for our seat in a section they assigned us. Wasnt hard by the way but still had to look for it.  Food came soon after: red velvet shake-bomb.com, prime time burger- great but I couldnt really taste the brie, CARAMELIZED ONIONS ARE OH MY GOD GOOD, el diablo burger was spicy as hell but awesome, chile con queso fries are stupid good and the queso on the diablo is ridunculous.  Overall really damn good food and i really give it 4.5 stars but just slightly disappointed with the inefficiency.
3 The burgers were very good and fairly priced though with no sides. If this were a normal restaurant that would bring me back.  The beer selection was adequate. Although at least one other review complained about only having Arizona beers I thought that was a strength. The problem is that this isn't a normal restaurant. There are elaborate procedures to line you up, educate you on how to order, identify a table, then order at a cash register, then get your own condiments and soft drinks or water then carry your drinks, etc to the table. Tipping is expected though no service was provided except taking an order and identifying a table.  From there it is full service. The only service I can think of other than food and alcoholic beverages already ordered at the cashier would have been a second drink but we had our food shortly after beverages so didn't need another or dessert which wasn't needed. The waitress seemed nice and did check back. Something else which bothered me is that silverware is not provided except a steak knife and there are no napkins, just paper towels. So great burgers, good beers, complicated self serve systems and no table setting. I like restaurants. This doesn't meet my desires. I am not sure how mobility challenged customers could do it. I couldn't bring my wife. But good burgers...
2 This place can't figure out what it wants to be. Is it pei Wei for burgers or a sit down brew house?  Sad thing is that it is not really good enough either way. My burger was fine, but bland. In fact four of us ordered different things and all said the same thing.  Fries were great tho.  The whole standing in line thing was annoying. Then u sit and if u order anything else, you have to pay again.  People tend to order more beers after their initial order you know... Then while we r eating, we notice the line grow to around the building. Huh? The food is simply average for a high end burger joint, so why would anyone wait an hour standing in a line for it.  This place will either go to a regular sit down format or fail miserably.  Considering indulge burger failed just up the street, and their food was better, I see major fail here.
5 Fantastic juicy burger cooked to perfection. Order a beer and it is served in the coldest goblet you've ever seen. Can't wait to go back again. Staff is friendly and helpful.
5 Love this place. Highly recommended!
4 This spot has only been open for one week and they are off to a great start! We were immediately greeted outside the front door and told to walk in and meet the hostess who would assign our table number. So you go in, take your place in line and then the hosts will come over and give you a sheet of paper with you table number. We were given menus and deciding what to order. The line goes right past the bar and the bartender wasted no time offering us a drink while we waited. He then mentioned that the seats at the bar are first come first served and full-service. So we quickly got out of line and bellied up to the bar. The beers looked really great, but being a work day, I just stuck to water. My friend and I decided to split the Poblano burger and an order of the fries with Green Chile Queso. It took about 15-20 minutes for the food to arrive, they split the fries and queso, but we had to split the burger ourselves...no biggie. The queso we got was quite red in color i think it was the chile con queso as opposed to the green chile version we ordered, but it was delicious anyway. The burger was cooked the way we asked (med-rare) and it was stacked high with toppings and the bun held up to all of the juice. I went though about 4 paper towels during the meal, which to me is a good sign when eating a burger.   I am excited to go back and enjoy some adult beverages with some of the best fries I have ever had!
4 Hopdoddy is one of my new faves. They have a killer atmosphere and everyone working there is all smiles and "how can I help you"s. I love the rustic, Texas feel and the cute little sayings posted around.   A couple notes:  1) Be prepared to wait: I've waited up to 35 minutes, it's not bad, but I suspect I'll be less thrilled about it when it's really cold or hot outside. You wait in front of the restaurant, then wait in a line that conveniently circles the bar. It's worth the wait and usually there are free handouts of margarita samples, shake samples and fries.  2) The Mexican cola 'on tap' at the soda machine is not as good as the real deal, so just order the bottle of Mexican coke if that's your preference.  3) Sassy sauce is a tangy mayo they'll give you on demand, reminds me of horsey sauce, I'm a fan!  Get ready to wait for a great burger. My favorites so far are the classic and the Greek -- lamb with feta, onion, cucumber and more. YUM!
5 Drove by this location watching it being built many times thinking another burger place, do we really need another burger restaurant? Yes since it is close to home and great quality.  Tried going there last Saturday and the line into the restaurant was out the door, so we decided to come back another day.   Wide selection of burgers including bison which I will try next time, had the Llano Poblano Burger with a fried egg which was prepared well and very juicy with truffle fries which were very good. The true test were my kids thought this was one of the better burgers that they have had.  Location is very accessible with plenty of parking and the ambiance is very nice, with of course a bar, very modern decor and tv monitors that add to the atmosphere but does not make it a sports bar. Plenty of outside seating for the current awesome night dining.  Service was good but the waiter really does not need to do anything as they have a self serve drink dispenser.  Will go back to try the other burgers and encourage anyone to try this new resatauant.
5 I've only been here once since they opened a week or so ago, but I'm bound to be back soon. At first, the abnormal seating and ordering style is a bit weird. You stand in line, and in the mean time a hostess assigns you a seat number and gives you a ticket. Then you get to the cashier and order and you give them the ticket. In the end, it works out nicely, because you don't need to wait for a waiter to run your check back and forth, you can just leave when you are ready. The important part is is how fantastic the food is. The burgers were delicious, from the perfectly baked bun to the meat and toppings; my wife and I both loved it. Also, I highly recommend the truffle fries; they are out of this world delicious. The old-school style soda fountain is good too. Cream soda on tap? yes please!
5 Definitely the best burger in the Valley.    This is what a burger should taste like.  I have already been 3 times, and every burger has been delicious.  The Goodnight, has a great flavor, with sweet caramelized onions, fresh jalapenos, to kick it up a notch, with their secret sassy sauce.  The Terlingua is the preeminent chili cheese burger, with great tasting chile con carne, and  a few fritos to add another texture.  Probably my favorite so far has been the Primetime, with Texas japanese beef, truffle aioli, and caramelized onions.    The fries are great as well, whether you get the regular fries or the truffle fries.  Fresh cut and fried and well seasoned.    Don't miss the shakes either, I tried the Red Velvet shake, and there were chunks of cake throughout the shake.    The soda fountain is loaded with Maine Root soda.  They are far superior to what you get with a Pepsi or Coke product, plus they are all made with cane sugar.  I can't get enough of both the Root Beer and Cream Soda.  The ordering system is a bit different, but it allows quick service once you place your order.  It will get quicker as people get used to how it works.  Still not sure what to think of the tipping system.  The servers bring you your food, and refill your drinks, but it isn't full service, so not sure what a fair tip is.  People who say the food isn't that good don't know good food.  Everything is made fresh, expertly prepared, and served hot.
5 Best burgers in the valley - hands down (JMHO). Fun and attentive servers. You can't go wrong here. My BF and I have tried most of the burgers on the menu and have had no complaints about any of them.  Well, maybe I've complained about one or two being super messy but, in the end - who doesn't love licking sassy sauce off their fingers (and maybe their arm)?  Personally my favorite burger is the Magic Shroom.  Runner up is the Buffalo Bill, or maybe the Terlingua?  The fries are crispy, not greasy and awesome with a side of green chile queso (*drool*).  Also, the salads - yes this is a burger, fries, and shake place BUT - they make great salads!  Spinach and arugula plus a turkey burger patty is yummy and, to my surprise, I don't feel like I'm missing out on anything (burger, fries, shake) when I order it.  The ordering process seems to bother some people but remember these key points...  1) The line moves FAST and the host/hostess will happily explain the process to you if you are confused 2) The servers come around with samples of fries and shakes on a frequent basis 3) The bartender will let you sample beer as you progress in line past the bar but... 4) You don't have to order your first round of drinks as you pass the bar while in line.  The bartender is only asking in case you're thirsty while in line (which you probably are, see #2).   5) Once you're at your table you'll have a server who will take care of everything for you.  Drinks?  Refills?  Sauces?  Shakes?  Yes, the server will handle all of that.  Seriously, if you haven't been - TRY IT!
5 It's all you could want in a burger joint. Being new, this place was hopping but there is plenty of seating so there was no waiting around. The staff was extremely nice and peppy, helping us every step (literally) of the way.   You order at the window and can pick up a drink at the bar on the way. The beers come in frozen goblets big enough that you have to hold them with two hands--I was one happy girl. Try the watermelon ale like I did if you like a lighter beer, it hits the spot.   The burger list is not extensive but they are crafted well, I ordered the primetime which has Brie cheese, truffle oil, and steak sauce--why not try something rich your first time around? My friend got the el diablo burger which was nice and spicy-- they have something for everyone's taste buds.    I know this place will have a lot of success in the near future and as their shirts say "we spank our patties and they like it". Well I definitely approve of whatever they are doing!
5 Food was amazing, but the set up is a little strange.   Let me also emphasize the food was amazing.   However, upon arrival, you are greeted and ushered to an ordering station to place your order and pay for your food, and then are given a table number. When seated at your table you are then greeted by your 'server' who will be taking care of you from this point on.   So after my wife and I finished our meal, we ordered dessert from our server, who then brought us a second check.   It seemed strange for us to be paying for food twice in one sitting, but that is how it goes at Hopdoddy.   Did I mention the food was amazing?
3 I have been on a search to replace Indulge, which heartbreakingly closed a few months ago and was my favorite burger, shake and fries of all time. Hopdoddy was a really promising replacement potential. I love how serious they are about healthy beef, local food, etc. Exactly what I am looking for. The location is super cool, as is the concept. The staff was 10000% nice and very helpful. Sadly, I just really didn't like the burger. It tasted like an at home burger, heavy on the pepper taste, and just not what I was looking for. The fries were really good though, as was the made from scratch bun. Finally, the shake was trying to be too much. I had them make me just chocolate, no stout. It tasted heavy on something, like cinnamon. This place is great, probably for someone who likes more interesting tastes (my boyfriend LOVED his poblano burger), but not someone like me who just likes a straight up delicious classic cheeseburger, fries and shake. The hunt for a replacement continues.   The only other thing to mention is that it took about 40 minutes from line to table - hopefully that is just because it is popular as it just opened.
4 My husband and I were on a date and stumbled by this place. We went up and found out it was friends and family night but they would let us come in if we agreed to critique our food and service-absolutely! It was fun and different. The drink selections were great. The fries with green chili quest amazing.if you are looking for a different kind of burger place this is your place.
4 First time I had gone to Hopdoddy so I went with the Continental. Probably the best turkey burger I've ever had and it actually looked like a burger ready for its photo shoot. The staff was very friendly and engaging.
5 I do not eat red meat but love me a delicious Turkey Burger!! I wanted something different and I got the prim time burger with the turkey patty.   Hands down the best Turkey Burger I have ever had!! I loved every juicy bite! They also have great milk shakes. I got the Parmesan truffle fries, Just as Good.   The service was great and every thing looked as it was moving smoothly due to the fact they just opened.   The concept of ordering is kind of difficult when you have little ones so next time I will send my husband to order and ask to get seated sooner then later.   Very excited I tried the burger place looking forward to going back.
5 Found a new favorite burger place! Won't bore you with explaining the ordering process, since everyone else has. My daughter and I shared the Primetime, the Goodnight and parmesan truffle fries. Both burgers were cooked as ordered - medium rare - and were flavorful and "messy juicy". The fries were to die for...she was even digging to the bottom of the paper cone to get all the goodness that had settled there! We also both had the cream soda...a great change from the usual soft drink offerings. Definitely putting Hopdoddy into our lunch rotation.
2 First note that what I need in a restaurant is pretty specific.  Good food of course, but more important than that for me is the timing.  Every weekday I leave work, pick up the little one from daycare, call a restaurant for dinner pickup, and pull in the driveway as my wife is getting home so we can all have a nice family dinner.  I have probably 6-8 restaurants in the usual rotation, but am always looking to add more good ones.  I called Hopdoddy last night from the car for pickup, and was told by the manager who may have been named Brandon that they don't do call ahead orders, but he said if I came in and ordered it would be ready in 10 minutes.  My kid is 2, so waiting in a restaurant is near the top of my list of things I like to avoid, but at this point I was already in the car, so even if I stopped for a fast food it would take almost 10 minutes, so what's the harm in the extra couple minutes?  Fine, we'll give it a shot.  So to begin, 8 minutes alone in line.  I wasn't purposefully timing it, but thanks to a phone call ending as I got there compared to the time on my receipt, the timing was done for me.  I don't blame the restaurant for this part; they have two registers to order from, but one of them was taken up for most of that time by a couple in their 80's who must have decided this was the first time they were going to order food from anywhere, or they just liked to small-talk, I'm not sure, but they took forever.  The part that really got me was that we waited 20 minutes after ordering for our food to come out (thanks again to the time on the receipt for helping me track this one).  I don't like smoke being blown up my butt by anyone, but 20 minutes with a hungry toddler is much, much more than double the headache of 10 minutes with a hungry toddler, so don't tell me 10 minutes if it's going to be 20.  Then to top it off they bring the food on 'for here' plates, despite the two places they had indicated it was take out, combined with the fact that they seated us at their mini booths specifically for take out orders, so we then had to wait while they packaged it up.  Unfortunately this place has worked its way out of the rotation based solely on the fact that they don't take call ahead orders, hopefully that new burger place opening up by Pita Jungle does now that Indulge has sadly closed down.
2 Just a dumb concept to have to stand in line to get food.  We wanted drinks first (unwinding after work) and then decided on food. The server can't get us food. So then we have to stand in line for an hour!   Not doing that. So we should just keep drinking and then drive.  Makes no sense!
1 This restaurant has the worst waiting situation. Don't go on a busy night. You have to wait in line outside 30-60 minutes. No waiting area no seating. We were not to stand at the bar because the hostest did not want to " crowd the area".  Didn't get a chance to eat and probably won't go back to try. Very poor planning for a new restaurant.
5 Skyler hit the nail on the head. This concept is a little different but the food is amazing. I had the Buffalo Billy and my girlfriend got the Continental. We both agreed the size was perfect (maybe a little big), and the quality of the product exceeded our expectations.   One thing - I don't think this is a place where you go for drinks. The process of ordering and eating doesn't seem to fit well with sitting and having beers and watching a game. And honestly I think that's okay because there are enough places to do that around here anyway.   You can tip when you order or you can tip your server (this confused us at first so I asked a manager). The tips among cooks, servers, food runners etc are pooled. The bar is treated as it's own.   Bottom line, great food, great service and I place I look forward coming back to again.
4 I was confused by the initial setup. I was greeted by hostess & I told her how many in our party and she told me to go stand at the end of a line where there were already a few people. They don't take your name & how many and give you an approximate wait time, you just wait in this line until it is your turn. Once it is your turn you go to the counter to order & pay for your food. It is also during this time that you are assigned your table #, where you will be sitting. I found it a bit odd that the receipt had the option to write in a tip before you experienced the service but I suppose you could leave that at zero and leave cash on the table. Also while waiting in line a server made the rounds asking if anyone wanted a drink. I ordered a beer and rather than having that added onto my bill I paid her separately. After ordering you sit and wait for the server to bring you your food. One positive note is that since you already paid when you are finished you can leave whenever, you don't have to try to find your server to get your check and settle up. I will say that the food was amazing. I ordered the Buffalo Bill and the cashier made the comment that was her favorite. When the server came & was identifying the burgers while passing them out when she came to my Buffalo Bill she also commented how that was her favorite. They weren't lying...this was an awesome burger!! I could say it was on par with Gordon Ramsay BurGR @ Planet Hollywood (at least my burger was). I was very pleased with the beer selection too...all local breweries, $5 for a good size amount. I would make a return visit.
3 Hail ceasar was relatively boring.. Dressing was bland. Baby kale salad was really good. Turkey burger was okay... Don't get the gluten free bread! Drinks were good.
2 I gave two stars because the experience is fundamentally flawed. The food was pretty good, though, maybe a 3.   First, we lined up outside. It felt a little bit like waiting for a ride at the state fair. You really had no idea what was happening, how seating worked, etc, until you got closer.  They had a waitress taking bar orders in line, which frankly is the only reason I stayed at that point. However, you had to close your tab at the time of service.  Once you get in to the counter to order, still not clear on what is going on, you've paid one bill (for the drinks) and are now carrying a massive goblet of beer. You order, are told what # booth you've been granted, and pay again. If you want water, you are given a cup at that time. So, now you've paid twice and are walking around with two beverages in your hand looking for your booth number.  The food came out pretty quickly. Unfortunately, requesting another beverage now means yet another bill I have to pay.  Honestly, I really wanted this place to work. I like the look and the vibe it has. But please, get a proper hostess and seat people normally. Let the waitstaff you've already hired take orders from the table. Get rid of the whole line thing. It's unnecessary and kind of a pain. It's way too much work for a semi-decent burger and a beer or two.  The menu is admittedly very limited. You can have some variation of a burger, a salad, fries, and a drink. Don't expect much else. It's like going to 5 Guy's with a bar and a trendy atmosphere. The waitstaff was friendly and accommodating. I know they all were, because literally every one of them waited on us at some point. That alone was confusing as well. I never knew who to flag down when I wanted another beer.  Once all of this is fixed, I'll be back to see if I like the food a second time, but not before.
5 OMG! This place has the best burgers in town. I ordered Primetime, my hubby had El Diablo and my friend had Llano Poblano. All of us enjoyed perfectly cooked juicy burgers. Oh and we shared truffle fries and was crisp and seasoned perfectly. They do offer condiments but everything was seasoned just right and didn't need any additional sauces to kill the flavor. No one complained and enjoyed every single bite. Can't wait to be back soon to try other items.
3 Like its been said before, the set up is a little odd. You walk in & stop at bar to order your drinks then head to back counter to order your food. We went with the Continental (turkey burger) & a standard type burger for my daughter with an order of truffle fries. Price came to $26 with tip. Servers were all very friendly & stopped by periodically to check on us. My turkey burger was very moist likewise my daughters. The fries were almost in edible they were so over salted. Over all cute place, nice concept.
4 There have been an abundance of new burger and beer bars that have popped up recently in the valley.  Hopdoddy is riding that trend, along with filling a burger gap  in the Scottsdale-Shea area after the closure of Indulge Burger.    The concept here is simple: walk in and get greeted by hostess, read menu,  stand in line, (order drink as you pass the bar if you want), order burger, be seated, receive burger.    QUICK TIP:  If you sit at the bar you don't have to wait in line!   I rather enjoyed my vegetarian sandwich and I'm not even a vegetarian ;)  The La Bandita (Black Bean-Corn Patty, Avocado, Goat Cheese, Arugula, Cilantro Pesto, Chipotle Mayo on Whole Wheat) was quite de-lish.    Sides do NOT come with the burgers.  The fries baskets are very "splitable" and are crispy and savory.  Waitresses/bartenders provide regular ketchup and house-special chipotle ketchup.    Also, there are several beers on tap including a few fun seasonal options.    Great vibe, tasty food, and a friendly staff at fair prices.  Check it out!
4 This place is quite different than anywhere else I've been before. That being said it is a good thing. It seems they can get quite busy at dinner time. I didn't have to really worry about that around 8:30pm on a Friday though. The outside of the restaurant looks really great and so does the inside. You order at a register and take a seat while you wait for your food. The burger is above average and you can definitely distinguish their burgers from ones that aren't as organic their burger is. The garlic fries are to die for and I suggest getting them. The soda drinks they offer were a little odd but made with real sugar instead of high fructose corn syrup. They had diet coke though for those who like that. The people were very friendly and dinner was enjoyable. There are TVs all over the place playing sports so that was a bonus for me. I would go here again.
3 Have been here three times now and really enjoy the food. The prime time burger is delicious and so is the beer. I really dislike the ordering system here and will only eat here if I can sit at the bar so I get full, normal service. Really wish they would change it to a normal sit down place. It would make it much less confusing and frustrating. Other people feel the same way based on some reviews.
3 I thought the ordering and service were clumsy. The burgers and fries weren't bad but I didn't taste anything that would make me rush back.  A nice collection of beverages there, from the eclectic fountain drinks to the beer selection, you won't be disappointed.  Staff was friendly and polite.  Grass fed and Gluten free options were the reason we came and they were satisfying.
2 Thank goodness they weren't busy.  There was only one other party in front of us and we still had to wait quite a while to place our order.  I couldn't imagine if the place was busy.  The fries are out of this world, the raspberry white chocolate shake was meh as it wasn't very thick and the burger was poor.  I asked for it medium rare and it was brown all the way through and VERY greasy.  Combine this with the loud atmosphere and I won't go back.  There are so many better burger places and it isn't worth going just for the fries.
3 Burgers and drinks (I like the Lil' Prick although I hate the name) were delicious. We ordered 6 burgers on a busy night and they came quickly and without problems.    Ordering process is a nightmare but once you are sitting everything is taken care of. Servers were fun and quick.   We will go back, on a slower night I hope.
4 Finally made it to Hopdoddy's last night. I was impressed with the staff and customer service however, the food is what brought the 5 stars to a 4. It was good but not great. The flavor was there but not a flavor that I would tell all my friends about.   The likes- the caesar  salad / fries (crispy) /shakes/customer service.   The dislikes- way too much wasabi on the tuna burger. Gf's burger didn't have much flavor too it.   I would try this place again, but I think I'll try something else on the menu for the burger options. I
2 I felt strongly enough about my experience here to actually write a review. I work nearby and my co-workers and myself decided to come here for a Friday happy hour. Some of us arrived at 3:30pm and grabbed drinks at the bar while we waited for others to arrive. Including us there were less than 10 customers in the whole place. When more people arrived we wanted to move to a table. The employee we talked too was not accommodating and was very disrespectful. She said we had order first and pointed to where we would line up to order food. We told her that we were gonna have drinks first and get food later, it was only 3:30. She insisted we couldn't get seated at a table until we ordered. She then said we couldn't be seated until our whole party was present. I then mentioned that maybe we should go across the street to Macayos and we could get a table there! To which the employee said, " you certainly can but their burgers aren't as good." We all had full drinks and finally got a table and decided to stay. We still had to go to the bar to order drinks, where I was charged $1 FOR THE ICE in my drink!!!!  The food was good but nothing special and didn't come with a side. The entire service model is inefficient and breeds poor customer service. At one time I counted 8 employees standing by the back counter talking for an extensive period of time while there was maybe 12 customers in the place and we could have used a server to get us some drinks. I was more appalled later when the place was packed and a line waiting outside and there were 3 male employees outside just chatting with the "burger bouncer" while there is a line of customers that I'm sure could be served or assisted in some way.   My expectations of my employees in the service industry is much higher, I wish I could remember the name of the female employee that was so disrespectful and unprofessional. If you like even half-assed service don't bother coming here.
3 After a day of Black Friday shopping decided to take my wife out for a nice lunch and just happened to drive by and decided to give it a try.  First, I prefer table service vs order pay and wait, reminds me of a fast food restaurant and not a great burger joint . . . zero stars.  The Burger once it arrived was out of this world, I had the Primetime . . . three stars.  The Fries were cold and definitely over seasoned, I had the Truffle Fries . . . zero stars.  I really wanted this place to be GREAT . . . but I was left wanting so much more . . . I might be back, but I would need to be in the area . . . not worth a separate trip.
4 We really enjoyed our meal at Hopdoddy. The concept was a little confusing when you first walk in as to what to do but once the hostess came to us and explained it we were fine. I ordered the "El Diablo" and it was cooked perfectly. It is pretty spicy as a caution but nothing crazy. My wife ordered the Ahi Tuna burger that was also very good aside from using too much wasabi so you may want to ask them to go light. Fries were pretty good and they have a decent beer selection. My one gripe was the beer glasses they use. Kind of look like Margarita glasses and they are very heavy. Overall though we really enjoyed ourselves and will come back.
5 Loved this place! Best veg burger ever.  Really nice servers, super clean , great interior, good music, and Mexican fountain coke! Every detail was well thought out. I'll be back often.
4 This place is super busy! Either go early or wait til after the dinner rush or else you'll be standing in a line outside the door. However, once you do get in, the food is really excellent. I got the llano poblano burger which I highly recommend. Everything was high quality from the bun to the bacon on top. But the real show stopper here: TRUFFLE FRIES. At first, the thought of paying $6 for fries was utterly disturbing to me, but when my boyfriend and I saw the size of the portion, we were cool with sharing a batch.  EAT THE TRUFFLE FRIES. IF YOU DO NOT EAT ANYTHING ELSE, THAT IS OK. BUT EAT THOSE FRIES. Side note: the guy who stood outside the door to greet customers and hand out menus was wearing a shirt that said "burger bouncer" and I thought it was awesome.
1 After my second trip to hopdoddy I figured I'd do a review. The process of ordering is designed to get you to spend more money and receive less service and time to enjoy your dining experience. They count on most people ordering a drink at the walking bar thats your first bill. When you finally make it to the register to order your food they give you a table number and your hit with your second bill. If you'd like another drink be ready to get your wallet out for the third time. So to me they figured out how to get you to take out your billfold over and over and over again. Makes sense for the business owner as they now have several opportunities to get you to spend more money. But the customer and server are the ones on the short end of the stick. Half of you're dining experience is spent standing around being shuffled down the line with your five pound mug waiting to get your next bill. Most people tip on service which is almost nonexistent so the servers get crappy tips. The food was ok but we ordered are burger well-done both times as my wife is pregnant and cannot consume rare meat and each time they were served to us medium rare. Which brings me back to the service or lack of. No one came to check with us for about 20 minutes by then we were out the door never to return. Hey Mr. HopDoddy Your ass backwards ordering system my seem good for your bottom line but everyone in my party left pissed-off and you will lose your customer base...
5 We got here just before the rush. I had the diablo burger which was über spicy but delishum. My girlfriend had the llano poblano burger which was also delishum. The truffle fries were good but not great. Our server, LoLo aka Lo aka Lolita was great! She had a great personality and was quick with refills. They have a unique selection of organic soda flavors too. We topped our experience off with some milkshakes and WOW!
5 Hopdoddy has everything I like. Such as a wide variety of craft beers, fresh margaritas, fresh tasty burgers, unique crispy fries, and friendly staff. I had the prime time burger which was cooked to perfection and was one of the best burgers I have ever had. I also had the truffle fries which were on my top 10 fries list. If you are in the area I highly suggest checking this place out.
4 PROS: Tasty food & drink, slightly swanky ambiance, decent prices for the quality/ambiance and pleasant staff.     CONS: Awkward ordering/seating/service system.   Here's some more detail, if that doesn't tell you everything you need to know.  FOOD/DRINKS: My husband and I split the caramel and sea salt milkshake, which was delicious  - creamy with really great caramel flavor accentuated by the salt.  It's not huge - a little smaller than a Solo cup - which was actually great for us but smaller than the average milkshake.  A nice big serving of tuna on the ahi sandwich - served raw in the middle and seared on each side.  The toppings really make it pop - lots of flavor from the terryaki sauce, honey wasabi and crunchy nori.    The la bandita burger has a great patty, and between the cheese, avocado and chipotle ketchup (we asked them to leave out the mayo and added their chipotle ketchup ourselves, instead), it really tastes great.  The whole wheat bun adds a sligth sweetness.  Note: sides are sold separately.  This suits me fine, but just FYI.  ATMOSPHERE: Very nice ambiance - a bit industrial with lots of blond wood and low lighting and no wall in front of the kitchen.  The booths are particularly awesome - comfy benches, high but with foot rests.  The beautiful bar has them, too.  ORDERING SYSTEM: You have to stand in a line (that isn't too efficient) to order your drinks(at the bar) and food(at the counter), while a hostess assigns you a table (but doesn't take you to it, just sticks your number on it).  She hands you a slip with your number, which you have to hand over when ordering.    Just in case the nice atmosphere has fooled you into thinking you're in a regular nice restaurant, just before the food counter, a sign reads, "Woah, nelly!  EASY ON THE MODIFICATIONS, PLEASE"  The did leave the mayo off both sandwiches for us without complaints, but I'm reluctant to try substituting the veggie patty for meat in their mny menu items the future.  Once you've ordered, you're funneled through a fountain drink/condiment station and let out in one corner of the restaurant.  You go find your table and your food and drinks are gradually delivered to you by pleasant people.    Another weird thing is that, at this point, a server comes over and says he'll be taking care of you.  My first thought is that I just stood in a long line and endured a rude sign to do my own ordering - am I now expected to tip this perfectly nice fellow for refilling my water?  CONCLUSION: We'll definitely be back, but it'll be in spite of the ordering system.  Also, we'd probably think twice about coming here with other couples because of the initial awkwardness.
4 GREAT burgers - loved every last bite of the Goodnighter. Lots of options, all sound great.   A little overwhelming on your first visit, but the staff guides you to the right spots to order and sit. Fried were good, but not great. Will definitely be back through - fantastic burger and would love to try more of the menu and shakes.
4 My wife and I have been wanting to come here since it opened a few months ago.  We were forever passing by this place and it always looks happening so it must be pretty good, right?  Absolutely!  They did a great job renovating this place from a Lone Star Steakhouse (I think).  It is modern, open, and clean.  The place really is quite comfortable and a perfect place for some beers and burgers.  Most importantly it wasn't Scottsdale-doochey.  There is pretty much always a line and that's ok.  It moves pretty fast.  They ordering and seating system is pretty strange at first but there are tons of workers there that will give you the deal.  Basically, as you move through the line, you look over the menu and order a drink at the bar if you are interested.  Then, when you get to the register, you give your food order (after looking at a giant menu on the wall with no prices which pissed me off).  After you pay you find your table table and wait for your food.  After about 10 minutes your food arrives.  I know I explained the process poorly, but to sum it up think "strange but efficient".  Anyway, the burgers and fries I tried were excellent and likely nothing there is not a solid choice.  I want to try EVERY salad, burger, and side because they all look excellent.  Next time I'll Yelp more about the actual food instead of the actual place and process.  The staff were all very very friendly and efficient.  The only problem I have with this place is the beer selection.  It was seriously lacking.  There are like 10 things on tap (mostly local) but were things you could find at just about any other place in town.  I was hoping for some more interesting selections.  I can't wait to return.
5 This place was REALLY good. I had the ahi tuna burger, my wife had the turkey burger. Both were flawless. We also ordered a large side of fries, which was also awesome. Great beer list, and some pretty interesting craft drinks. My wife had the Moscow Mule. She said it was great. Good stuff----can't wait to come back.
3 I am very hopeful for this place but unfortunately I have to give 3 stars based on my visit tonight. My first visit was 5+ stars best burger ever. Tonight was more like 2.5.   They warned us in advance that the burger is cooked medium rare which is exactly how we like. When it came out all 4 of our burgers were fully well done without the jalepenos and some of the amazing flavor from our first visit. Long story short it was inconsistent, leaving us still craving that first amazing burger experience.  I will say the service is great, so is the atmosphere and concept.   We are going to give it another chance because we LOVED our first visit so much. Please cook it medium rare next time! :-) it's a burger joint, and that's pretty important.
4 I've been wanting to try this place ever since they opened up. I've been driving by this place a few times a week since they opened. So today was the day. I was excited with anticipation because of all the reviews.   When we first walked in, we were greet with a smiling face and handed a menu. It seems like a lot of newly opened place are using this system. Order and pay then they will serve you at your table. One difference between the other places is Hopdoddy reserves your table while you wait in line.   I ordered the Buffalo Bill Burger which is buffalo and the Kennebec fries. I really enjoyed it. Nice and juicy with lettuce, tomato, and bacon. Yum yum. The fries were so fresh. I ordered a large fries to split with my family. They were so hot (temp). Everyone couldnt stop eating the fries. My wife ordered the Continental Club Burger which is the Turkey burger with grilled onions. She really enjoyed the burger which is surprising because she never likes burgers. I tried it and it was really juicy and cooked perfect. Really good.   The service was surprisingly good. Once we sat at our booth, our server introduced herself and said that she was going to take care of us. She brought us out all of their different ketchups. She was even willing to fill up our drinks even through the drinks are self serve. The trays were cleared from our table in a timely manner.   Overall, I wasn't disappointment. I had a really good time and good food. Enjoy cause I sure did.
3 Love a fun burger! This place was pretty good.  Not the best though.  My guys blue cheese was weak, I think it's the cheese bc my goat cheese was hard to tell it was there. We like a stronger cheese! Ran outta iced tea too, boo
5 Happen to pass this place yesterday while driving...So Glad I decided to have dinner there last night. The environment is modern and hip...family dinner, fun date, or hanging out. The food...DELISH! I had the Greek burger-lamb, feta cheese, arugala, (asked for caramelized onion), taziki sauce, and cucumber.  That burger was devine! Not sure if its bcuz I hadn't eaten food all day, or bcuz it was new...but I thoroughly enjoyed it. The margaritas (one the rocks) was so one point-no watered down drinks there. The wait staff/bussers/bartender were very inviting and patient.   Based on my initial visit; I would most definitely go again.   *constructive criticism* the order process is weird...there's no sign that tells you how the restaurant works. If it werent for the bartender telling us (we did look lost and confused-no hostess greeted us). U go thru a line to order-you pay-(they assign you a seat)-you find your seat-from there any additional items the waiter gets..but you have to pay again. The place was pretty busy but there was no long line. Its evident that long lines do form tho...there is crowd rope,a water dispenser and seating while you wait outside.   There should be a "how it works" poster or something posted so newbies aren't completely lost (like we were-and the two couples behind us).  I did order a bottled drink Kombucha(sp?)-It was terrible. The cashier did warn me it was a slightly carbonated "hippy drink"(her words). My goodness-it taste like vinegar and...earth.  My husband order the red velvet shake...he loves red velvet cake. His review-they just dumped some pieces of r.v.cake in the mix and a few cake chunks on top.
5 Amazing food and awesome service. Reasonably priced. I will be back to try more flavors of burgers and brews.
4 Good burgers, friendly staff, I usually sit at the bar. Sometimes too much salt and I prefer the bun without the butter.
5 It's great food for sure!! Enjoyed every bite. Great service! You order and then sit which in most places that are similar you aren't told that.. Then end up sitting at a table for 10 minutes wondering where's my server! They greeted us by opening the door and walked us through the whole process. Looking forward to our next trip to Hopdoddy
5 My hubby found this place on Yelp when he searched for "Burgers and beer," our two favorite things.  When he looked on Hopdoddy's website and found out they were from Texas, he was really interested in trying it.  I remember seeing this place on South Congress in Austin before.  If it's on Soco, it's gotta be good.    He ordered the Goodnight burger and I ordered the Llano Poblano burger.  We got a small side of fries, which really was only big enough for one person, so when we go back, we will be upgrading to the large to share.  The Llano Poblano has grilled poblano peppers, bacon, onion, tomato, and some sort of delectable sauce on it.  The Goodnight burger had fresh jalapeno and the best grilled onions my hubby had ever had.    They have a great local beer list, including beers from Phx and Flagstaff.  If you are jonesing for an AZ craft brew, this is the spot to go.  Our only knock on this whole place though, were the huge goblets that the beer comes in.  Those goblets are better suited for margaritas or a drink you can drink with a straw.  They are a little cumbersome and unstable for good hard beer drinking.  Overall, there is no question that we will be back!  I'm already craving that Chipotle ketchup again!!
2 I really don't understand why this place has gotten so many stars. Its a weird setup. First, you go in, and stand in line (McDonalds style) to order a burger and drinks. Wait staff are shuffling next to you and jostling to get by. You're standing in line being jostled on one side and have a loud kitchen in the other.  You pay for your food. You sit and wait. The burgers weren't great. The meat was gummy and had the feel of biting into some gelatinous gooey meat like substance. Not a burger. The hubs had a super salty veggie burger and my kid had a grilled cheese that was basically a hamburger bun turned inside out and buttered within an inch if it's life and pan fried. It was greasy and gross and she smeared buttery handprints on every surface she could touch (She's two - she can't help it. I cleaned up before we left with a wipe, but even for a toddler, it was a gross amount of grease.) The saving grace of the meal was the truffle fries, but I'm kind of partial to truffle oil and can eat that with a spoon, so maybe I'm not a good judge. We ordered a shake to round out our meal and had to pull out our credit card a second time during the meal to pay for it. (WHY don't they just have you order all your food at the table like a normal restaurant so you don't have the hassle of paying multiple times for one meal? I mean, you have the wait staff... They did take an order at my table...) It's a stupid setup. The place is too loud. The food is below average (I like to only give one star to restaurants that ultimately give me the trots, and at least they didn't give me food poisoning). And it's not kid friendly. Save your money and go pick up some burgers at In N Out and rent a movie at home. The experience and the food would be far better. (Yes, I called a fast food burger better...) I would judge this place "Not worth the calories and the drive."
4 The food and drinks at Hopdoddy are top-notch. I had the Classic Burger, Parmesan Aioli fries and a PV tea (a cocktail similar to a Raspberry Arnold Palmer). So delicious and such a creative menu. I could come back tons of times and probably never get bored. They even have grass-fed meat and composting bins. I LOVE LOVE LOVE that they are trying to be local and eco-conscious. More restaurants should be like this. The only reason for knocking off a star is for an unfair reason. I DID volunteer to sit at the bar (which is full-service where the rest of the restaurant is fast-casual style). It ended up being a bad choice, because I was right on the edge where all of the other customers are waiting in line, and some rather inconsiderate folk took it upon themselves to lean up against the bar, practically putting their elbows in my food.  Of course, this is not Hopdoddy's fault. Some people are just blind to the situations around them.
4 Great milkshakes, had the one with nutella which was really good but maybe a bit high on calories but who cares if its good :) Burgers were also good maybe not the best ever but really good. Had the bison and was completely satisfied. Would have been nice if this place was located more central but you can't always get all that you want
2 "One, I want an American cheeseburger..."  I will play the simple pros and cons game with this one.   Pros:    Cons:  Price ala carte grey burger (not flame grilled) odd seating  uneducated (about the food) bar tender no captain morgan at all, only some local Kingman rum (cause kingman is know for the rum)  Seriously the burger was good flavor but the texture and and color were off. I really really wanted to like it. It was a good sized of gray meat. uggh  If you are like me and want a good cheeseburger go to Bobby Q's and get eh Smokehouse burger medium rare. It rocks.
2 For me, the food is only half of the experience of going out, so I'll do some simple math:  (4 star food + 0 star dining experience)/2 = 2 stars.  done and done.    I'm not sure who was sitting in a restaurant somewhere thinking, "man, it sure would be great to find a restaurant where instead of sitting comfortably in a booth while someone takes my order, I could be standing in line waiting to give my order to someone", but apparently that incident took place, and this style was born.
5 De mis lugares de hamburguesas favorito.  La malteada de pretzel con nutela excelente, la hamburguesa con blue cheese y salsa bufalo muy  buena, asi como la Terlingua.  Un lugar muy recomendado  para visitar.    El lugar  esta muy agradable.  Los precios  razonables, en general un muy buen lugar  para comer una hamburguesa.
4 I really enjoyed Hopdoddys.   I an Arizona Native and over 21 so I usually avoid Scottsdale in general but I liked this.  Everything tasted fresh and came out hot.   I will say that the queso was a waste of money- not very good or interesting. Next time I go I will definitely try a salad.   Will be back for sure!
4 We had a great experience while dining at the bar. Excellent burger, extremely cold beer and the service staff was outstanding. If the prices seem  too high for some of you, then split a burger, they are large enough!
5 5 out of 5!!! Absolutely recommend this restaurant!!  I'm not normally a burger person but this is seriously the best burger I have had.  The bean burger is fantastic, the turkey burger amazing and the mushroom burger unbelievably good. Highly highly recommend this place!! The vibe of the restaurant is as good as the burgers!! I didn't try the milkshakes but they looked yummy!!! The fries... Delicious!!  Defiantly a must to try!
2 Burgers were only warm not hot for just coming off the grill, slightly undercooked red centers.  Lettuce on burgers was not good, wilted disgusting.  French Fries were 70% broken stubs looks like we got the end of a the bag average again not super warm.  Which I can't understand how food just coming out of kitchen is not HOT!  Servers were nice but when we said the meal was less than average they asked why, we told them our experience, said we could had sent it back and they want us to have a great experience. That was it... No follow up from anyone else no manager, supervisor etc, you can always save a less than mediocre experience by letting someone else know they care i.e. manager.    Had TV's on for the playoff game but no sound they were playing music so probably better places to watch a big NFL game.  Odd seating and ordering process you have to order first in line then get your seat, no real chance to "Study or ask questions on the menu", just plain weird to us.   All in all won't be coming back for just a $9 burger anytime soon.
4 This restaurant is only a few months old. It is located in the old Lonestar Steak House on Scottsdale And Mescal.  When you enter the restaurant, you are greeted, given a menu, and told what table you will be at. You then get in line and place your order. We had the classic Cheeseburger which comes with lettuce, tomato, onion and a sassy sauce which I had on the side. It is a ketchup, horseradish sauce and honey mustard. The honey mustard flavor is over powering so I am glad i got it on the side. The regular fries are tasty, crisp and not greasy. The bun on the burger is a brioche bun. The burger was cooked just the way I ordered it. My only objection is that I had a gift card which I tried to use but there was a problem with their system and I could not use it until they check into the problem. I was later told by a worker there that hey have had a number of problems with the gift cards. Someone needs to work on that. They have a greek burger with Lamb, Feta, onions, various other burgers and salads.
3 I come here often.  Standing in line for more than 15 minutes today.  Food is good but I am really second guessing returning based on the lack of concern and good customer service.
3 Food was delicious, beer comes in a frosted 16 oz margarita glass, and the milk shake was something I will probably crave anytime I want something sweet!  I didn't like that the burger came alone for $8, and then you had to buy the fries separate ($6) Seems overpriced for a burger and fries.  I had the el diablo- yum! And the truffle fries- good, but my friend had the green chili fries- we ate the truffle fries with the green chili sauce- so good!!!  It's a good place to meet with friends.
5 Probably my favorite real deal burger joint. Tap beer selection was a big plus for me as well, good selection of strictly local brew.   From the moment the staff opened the door for us it was a great experience. They were all very friendly and helpful... Sat at the bar and both bartenders personally introduced themselves to us and took care of us through out our meal... Made sure our beer/water glasses were never dry.  Food was awesome. Ordered the Diablo burger... Actually has strips of habanero on it. This is the burger I've been searching for all my life. A real deal burger with some burn... And being able to wash it down with some San tan hop knot just made it a perfect night in my eyes. ... I might also Menton that their home made margaritas are out of this world. If you enjoy a good marg Don't leave without experiencing one.  My only let downs....  the bottom of the burger bun was soggy and though the truffle Fry's were amazing... Seemed like all we had in or basket was bits n pieces... Almost like bottom of the bag.   4.5 stars, rounded to 5
5 Yummm. In two weeks, I have been to Hopdoddy's three times, and I am not a huge burger fan. I like the Salty Sow, but I love this place.   A wide variety of very high quality hamburgers. Yes, the quality of the meat makes a huge difference. The Primetime is sublime, and the regular hamburger is pretty darn good although it could use a little more lettuce and pickles. My third option was the Greek which was a little too rich for me, but still the flavor and quality was there.  The salads look good, but it's going to be hard to tear myself away from the prime directive.  Awesome truffle fries and one of the best Margarita's outside of Austin, TX which is no surprise as these guys are from Texas. Yeehaw, baby.  The ordering process when it's busy is a little laborious, but the service is excellent. I mean really great. Solicitous without too much hovering.  The burgers are on the pricey side if you are a In N Out fan, but if you want a great hamburger with high grade ingredients, then give Hopdoddy's a try.
3 I was debating on what to give Hopdoddy Burger Bar rating.  3 or 4 stars?  I finally decided on a 3 star (still wish I could give half stars) based on my previous visit to the one in Austin, Tx.  I believe I gave the Austin location on Congress St. 5 stars because I had great food and a great time.  This location in Scottsdale is set up a lot differently and when I came they didn't have any other special burgers to choose from.  I really liked the Austin location where they had a system of ordering and had a chalk board of specialty burgers, along with the standard menu burgers to choose from.  Also they had a bar station while you were walking your way to the counter.  I was happy to see the Scottsdale location offering only local AZ beers as the Austin one only served local TX beers.    Well after my initial impression my wife and I shared a buffalo bill burger.  It was good, not great.  Meet was very good and bun was fresh but something about it I honestly didn't care for.  I can't base my judgment on one burger alone, so I will come back here and try another one for a more fair review.    We ordered the garlic fries and they were really good.  Price was actually not bad, but in the gourmet burger market which has seemed to really blow up in the past few years, there are other ones that I would rather go to.  Again, I will be back, the employees working were super nice and friendly, restaurant was clean, good beer selection so I will come back.  Maybe next time they will have additional burgers such as Kobe meat burger or some sort of creation.
3 Pretty much everything that could be said about the maddening/idiotic ordering system has been said. We came early on a Friday (had to wait outside behind the "velvet rope" for about 10 minutes) and I absolutely know had we gotten there later (and as the line grew) my boyfriend wouldn't have even entertained the thought to wait longer out there. And I wouldn't even try to come here with more than four people.  We talked about how OF COURSE college kids in Austin are fine with waiting in line, drinking fishbowls of beer and dealing with the seating system, but what happens in Scottsdale in August at 115 degrees? Who the hell is going to be OK with waiting then?  (Yes, I saw they have misters, but give me a break)  That all said, the food was delicious and the price point was pretty great. Two burgers and an order of fries came out to under $21. I had their lone veggie burger, the La Bandita. The menu says it's a black bean/corn patty, but, due to it's rosy hue, it had to also contain beets (fine by me, just a note.) I subbed the goat cheese for pepperjack, and that combined with the avocado, arugula and cilantro pesto (no mayo for me) made for a dang tasty burger. Boyfriend had the El Diablo, topped with pepperjack, Carmelized Onions, Habanero and Serrano Chiles, Salsa Roja (no mayo for him either) and he loved it. We split a regular order of their regular fries (skinny, perfectly salted) and it was definitely enough to share. I can only imagine how ridiculous the fries with queso are.  So yeah, we'd love to be back for the food, but it all 100% depends on the line situation. Kind of a shame, really.
5 Probably my favorite burger joint. Everything about it was perfect. Great beer, great burgers with fresh ingredients.  Everything is hand crafted all natural and local.   Even the beer is local. How much better could it get. You don't drink beer, grab an all natural soda with real cane syrup that tastes great as well. These guys have it down.
5 I do not have enough good things to say about this place...we just happened to be on the yelp app while in the area, looking for something delicious to try. We found it! I had the Ahi Tuna Burger no sprouts and add avocado. It was insanely delicious, I had teriyaki sauce everywhere, I even got my hair stuck to my face with it, it was really attractive, let me tell you. I also had the Kennebec Fries with Chipotle ketchup! They were very crisp and great! Then I had the shake of the day which was Singh Farms Spiced Honey and Graham Cracker shake, I almost died from the overload of deliciousness, if I could drink that shake everyday I would! My friend had the Goodnight burger but I didn't try any.  We were both very pleased that they served local beers while also sourcing products from local vendors, like the Singh Farms Honey. They also said that they make all their own bread, so that's pretty cool! I definitely recommend trying them!
4 Amazing burgers and fantastic milkshakes! I highly recommend the Nutella and Pretzel milk shake. Only reason for the 4 stars and not five is the confusing ordering process.
1 Let me start by saying I love a good burger and don't mind paying a little extra to have a quality meal but on my first impression of this place I say Pass. We ordered a Greek burger and the Buffalo burger, regular fries and parm fries plus two drinks.....punch line it was $36.  The first two burgers that came out we're undercooked (we ordered our own temperature ) and had asked for no sauce on one but upon investigation I found assume under the one piece of lettuce which is not cool since I'm allergic. To the mustard in it.  Our server was very sweet and apologized and said she would make us two new ones. We  snacked on the fries while we waited 10 minutes for the new burgers. Side note, no visit from any manager yet to address this issue. While we waited a tray of dishes was dropped right by our table , coincidence ?? Second round of food came, no feta on the Greek and my side of fries from my plate had mysteriously disappeared from my plate.  Waiters came by to check on us and had to send her for fries and yes you guessed it still no manager got involved .  I love trying new places but this place is a one and done!!!!! I could have gone to Denny's, left full and had an extra $20 in my wallet
4 I wanted to try this place when I was in Austin, but did not get the chance. My husband and I visited this restaurant at 2 pm on a Saturday, so it was busy but not packed. We each ordered a burger and a beer and shared an order of queso fries. For those who like queso fries the way they are made in Austin, I would not recommend this dish. The cheese sauce is served on the side of the fries. It was very good - just not exactly what I expected. The burgers were delicious - definitely the best in the area. I love the draft beer selection, as this is one of the only places in Arizona that serves a large variety of Arizona-brewed beers. Great place to try  a new bev and I will definitely be coming back.   I'll admit, the ordering system is a bit confusing for Arizonans (you place your entire order and pay at the counter, then they bring out your food), but they do have servers for each table if you forget to order something or need another beverage. They offer self-service all-natural sodas (yay, sugar cane), so you definitely will never need to wait for a soft drink refill.  In all, two filling burgers, two local drafts and a large order of queso fries ran about $37. I've paid way more for food and drink of a lesser quality.
3 The burgers are spot on. Unique flavors and delicious. The atmosphere is really fun and the concept of ordering and having a table chosen for you is nice. It takes the pain of having to find a seat away.   However, I was really not impressed with wait staff. They say that someone will come around to get refills, take more orders, and get anything you need. That would be great if someone ever came around.   One thing that didn't meet my expectations was the chili cheese fries. They are definitely not what you would think. There's very little "sauce" and it really doesn't seem like it contains any chili. It's just portrayed all wrong.
5 I love hopdoddy,  went here a bunch when it first opened and tried almost all the burgers.  Definitely don't have any qualms about any burgers.  Be smart if you are unsure about something just ask for it on the side so you can control the amount you have. Definitely do this for the wasabi honey sauce on the ahi burger.   I highly recommend this place. The truffles fries aren't that amazing to get, try one of the others instead.
1 I called them up to place a to go order and I was told I can't do that.  So I drove down there to place my order in person.  After waiting in line for a few minutes I tried to place an order for 7 burgers to go for my office.  Apparently, their policy is you can't place a to go order for more than 3 burgers.  Apparently the kitchen can't handle this many orders at once.  WHAT A TERRIBLE POLICY!!!  What happens if more than 3 people order burgers in the same group?  I have NEVER heard of anything like this before.  They just lost a ton of business from my office because we eat out every day.
5 So I've been here about a half dozen times now since it opened. It's still delicious and amazing. It draws a crowd on weekends around dinner, but the hostesses do a great job of moving the line, getting drink orders for people in line, and even sometimes handing out free fry or milkshake samples. Only complaint is that occasionally, after the initial food delivery from my server, they went MIA, even though we stuck around and chatted for an hour or so, making refills and additional orders (shakes) difficult. Granted they were fairly busy, but still a bit of a bummer.
4 We arrived to a line that was starting to wrap around the side of the building, however, it only took about 20 minutes from the line outside to the cash register inside. This was our first time here, and we debated whether the line was a hype thing, or a good food worth-the-wait thing.   I ordered "The Goodnight" - Angus Beef, Tillamook Cheddar, Hickory BBQ Sauce, Caramelized Onions, Sliced Jalapenos, & Sassy Sauce (I decided to opt out on the jalapenos and sassy sauces)  He had the "Terlingua" - Angus Beef, Chile Con Carne, Corn Fritos, Tillamook Cheddar, Sassy Sauce  We shared the Parmesan Truffle Fries (holy cow - order these)  Gonna have to say that the line we encountered was most definitely a good food worth-the-wait thing!  The bun was amazing, the burger was cooked to a perfect medium, and everything was as ordered.   Overall: A We will be back - I want to give the shakes a go-round before ginving this a full on 5 star rating! Update to come!
4 Great classic burger and the fries are Amazing! My only suggestion would be narrow down the servers to 1! Too many people stopping by the table asking incessantly if they could get us something. I was constantly telling people we'd already been taken care of. If you're wanting privacy at dinner this is not your place.
5 Oh my goodness this is like Christmas in your mouth. I'm very impressed with this place. Quick service. Amazing Kennebeck home made fries, truffle fries, buns, and burgers. Everything is organically made and made fresh. It's like a chipotle for burger places. Hormone free, antibiotic free, etc....
4 I may have found burger nirvana in this place. I had heard about it several times including at the Yelp Elite Salty Sow event and then randomly from a buddy who was there and knowing I am a foodie said it would be right up my alley. So I planned to go with one of my riding buddies and lo and behold as I was waiting for him 2 of my other friends showed up (we didn't know the other would be there). Obviously word is going around about this place.  I have to say I was worried that my expectations were too high going in having heard of the wonder that was the parmesan truffle fries or the high quality meat in the burgers. Turn out I didn't have any reason to be worried at all.  This place hits the nail on the head for burgers. I had the primetime which was cooked perfectly and had such a great combo of flavors. It is easily in my top 5 burgers of all time and that is good company. I was really impressed at just how well all the flavors went together. I am glad I picked that burger as it is clearly a well crafted work of art.   I did have a hard time picking as all the other burgers sounded great too. My friends had the El Diablo and Goodnight burgers and i can honestly say I don't think I have seen burgers get devoured that fast before. Needless to say we were all impressed.  The fries didn't disappoint and the truffle sauce with them is amazing. We also indulged in some shakes. i have the Chocolate Stout Shake and it was great, the stout flavor was subtle but fantastic.  The food is a sure fire winner here....the ordering process not so much. The process for ordering isn't bad but it's awkward. What normally happens is you go through a line to order and get assigned at table where food is then brought to you. However since one buddy and I were ordering after the others we were told we could order right from the server at the table. The same was true of ordering additional food like the shakes. It was nice and our server was great it just was a bit odd. Not sure if this changes during big rushes though as we were there when it was late and emptying out.  In summary this place has awesome food go try it.
3 I really want to like this place. So much so that I've tried it three times hoping to get a better experience. First of all, no matter how long the line outside is, the hostess will give you the standard answer "20 minutes". It feels as though they love people standing out front in line to try and create a buzz. This is a restaurant, not a new nightclub. Well, it might be 20 minutes to get inside the front door, then another 15-20 to order. It's a very strange concept. If you are lucky you may get your own table. If not, they will either put a small partition on your table that you are sharing, or you may get a table alongside the line of people waiting to order. Problem is, you can hear the conversation of your table mates, rather you want to or not. Food is above average, and the shakes are very good. It is a little pricey. About $40 bucks for 2 burgers with fries and one shake and a soda. I can only hope they change their ordering and seating concept.
4 THE BEST BURGERS AND FRIES EVER! Everthing I have tried from here is amazing. The 4 stars would be a 5 if I didn't have to stand in line (outside) to wait for a table, then stand in line to order cafeteria style at the bar AND again for food, then have a server get me a soda refill and leave me feeling like I am supposed to leave a tip. If this place offered a comfertable place to sit while waiting and table service it would be a 5 star for sure.
5 The Goodnight Burger...It's so much more than just a burger. I mean, that first bite, oh, what heaven that first bite is. The bun, lightly toasted breast of an angel resting gently on the sassy and BBQ sauces below. Flavors mingling in a seductive pas de deux. And then, an onion! The most playful little onion, caramelized and flavorful. Then a slice of cheddar, lettuce, tomato and a patty of ground beef so exquisite. Swirling in your mouth breaking apart and combining again in a fugue of sweet and savory so delightful. This is no mere sandwich of grilled meat and toasted bread, Robin. This is God, speaking to us through food. --Marshall from HIMYM (kind of).  Walking in to Hopdoddy, it was clear this was no ordinary burger joint.  It's a hip, modern building with a bar in the middle and tables all around, including a lovely patio.  At first we were confused, but luckily the Burger Bouncer to the rescue!  He explained the process, handed us a menu, a table number, and sent us to the line.  By the time we reached the front we had decided...we both chose the Goodnight Burger, mine without the jalapeño.  We ordered a small order of fries on the side to share, a fountain drink, handed over our table number, and paid there at the counter.  The fountain drinks...a selection of main root sodas in various flavors; some familiar, some new.  I saw bright drinks on other tables in pink, green and blue.  I chose the mexicans cola and was quite pleased.  For my water-drinking fiancé, there was carbon filtered water though I'm not sure what that means.  Right behind that were two disposal cans, one for recyclables and one for compost.  I'm not sure if the general public is able to discern compostables (saw someone putting the dredges of a milkshake in there) but I appreciate the effort!  Finally, the service was impeccable.  Everyone we encountered was super friendly and personable.  The team here works like a well-oiled machine, using teamwork and efficiency to keep everyone happy without missing a beat.    My only regret is that this restaurant is pretty far.  It will certainly be on my mind when we are in the neighborhood though.  The cocktail menu looked awfully intriguing!
5 I'll start off by going out on a limb and saying that this place has the best burger I have ever had ! EVERYONE MUST TRY THIS PLACE!   Honestly it's delicious, and the place is so great because they have all types of burgers, ranging from the most simple to the most elaborate. I'm a classic burger kind of gal, so if you're classy too and go with the classic burger you won't be disappointed. Be mindful of the sassy sauce because it is definitely a hit or miss depending on your taste buds, it can't hurt to get it on the side! In addition, they have PICKLES!! Not one type of pickle either.. we got two types to choose from ladies and gents and they are tasty. If you take walks on the wild side, any of the other burgers you go with are made to perfection, it really just comes down to how mature your pallet is because they have some crazy options here that won't let you down.   Lets talk about the meat. The fact that the cows are humanely raised, antibiotic free AND the meat is ground fresh, in house, every day. It's really good for you and they don't make it crazy expensive because of it. Lets be honest, all pretentious jokes aside, the meat really does taste better and you will never get one of those gross gritty bites that meat has sometimes.   THE FRENCH FRIES!!! both types are killer, you must try both at some point when you are extra hungry.  THE BEER!! so many options, and you get it in this glass gauntlet that makes you feel like you're in Beowulf, in the mead hall celebrating a victory.   THE FOUNTAIN DRINKS! they are all so different and diverse, if you stand there for a few minutes and try them all they don't get mad at you- BONUS  GLUTEN FREE BUN! it's amazing and it tastes like a biscuit. It is also messy as ever but your eating a burger anyways.  For the people that don't like this place because its not traditional, don't be so boring!! The atmosphere is really cool, and they set it up differently then anywhere else I've been to. Go in, let them show you the ropes, and when you order something extra at the table and they bring you a separate check for the extra items ordered, don't be mad!! Did you think it would be free? Blasphemy! Long line on a Friday night? YOU MUST WAIT IN IT! Totally worth it. Last but not least, the staff is friendly and you can tell they all love working at such an awesome place!
4 Very tasty hamburger the total bill is a little pricey when you're just drinking sodas so expect about $40 for two people with tip
5 Excellent fries. Everything tasted fresh and homemade as advertised. Large portion- I could have eaten only half of my burger, but it tasted so good I couldn't stop. The gluten-free bun was one of the better gluten free breads that I have had! Cool concept and space.
5 Came here on Superbowl Sunday for cocktails before heading to a Superbowl party and had a blast! Service is awesome. The girl behind the bar was happy, upbeat, and nice. We did not eat here (since we had to save our appetites for the party) but looking around at all the food made our mouths salivate. We can't wait to come back and indulge on a couple burgers! The cocktails here were awesome. We are very excited to become regular customers of this place!
5 My second time back and I want more of it...!!!!   Great burgers. ...live the fries and the whole pkg....great concept. ..look totally cool ... great drink specials...very Groove. ... !!! It's a big WIN ...!!! THEY SUPPORT LOCAL FARMERS..!!!! :))))))
1 I am not sure what all of the hype is about this restaurant, but my experience was not so pleasant. I hate to post negative reviews, and I only do when a restaurant can be spectacular and miss the mark by miles.   I came in for lunch with my brother and sat at the bar. I was pretty specific about the order and it seemed the kitchen did not understand the assignment. I ordered the Greek burger, on wheat, hold the arugula and add romaine lettuce. Meal comes out on the egg bun, no lettuce. It was taken back to have romain added, and replace the bun, and instead of romain (which I know they have because they serve Caesar salads) it comes out with red limp lettuce. Upon taking a bite of the burger, I see that the inside is completely underdone. Obviously at this point, I'm over it.   The restaurant had more staff than patrons, so I'm unsure how details are overlooked. The bartender was nice, however she did not write anything down and lacked the ability to remember and had to ask three times what the specifics were.   My brother also had a burger, the traditional one with only ketchup and mustard. Apparently it was too much of a chore to put it on the burger and it came out plain.   I wanted a burger so bad this day and normally I go to Habit Burger, and their burgers are perfect, always consistent, perfect service, hot meat and cheese, super cold veggies and no matter what I change, they always get it right. It is probably half the cost also. I chose to try something new and my level of disappointment could not be greater.   The build out was nice, but the food was unable to match the decor. I am sure the concept is good. I heard who the owning partners are, and they always have great restaurants, so I am a bit shocked I was so disappointed.   Typically in the establishments I dine in, when there is a disappointed customer, some form of management comes out to ask about the experience, get details so they can address the kitchen appropriately. Not one person came out to inquire.   Word of advice, management should always come out and find out what happen so this can be rectified. Second, if you are going to call yourself a Burger Bar, and offer all of the options shown on the menu, the kitchen should be able to understand and prepare the order, as if they ordered it, and a temperature should always be requested.
3 Pros:  The blonde male bartender may be the nicest guy in the place, all around Burgers and fries came out in a timely manner Burgers were well cooked and yummy Above bartender was great to assist us when we had no server Great atmosphere   Cons: Really poor service from "servers" regarding clearing our plates, we really had no server at all Having to physically wave down someone for refills Slow afternoon, so a million servers and no service.   Overall, I like this place, the bartenders saved us and were great in taking care of us, let me taste different beers and had great suggestions for a blonde beer. I think it would be a fun place to hang out on a Friday night for drinks and some food. I'll go again as my grandparents said their previous experience was great.
1 I was so disappointed in my dining experience.  The service was terrible, they mixed up my friend and my orders and when we requested for them to fix it we received attitude in return.  This place is also over priced for the quality of the food.  I ordered the black bean burger which was ruined by the excess amount of goat cheese and awkward sauce.  Next time I have a craving for a burger I will definitely go back to smashburger instead.
4 Burgers be ballin' at this trendy burger joint. Served on the metal trays reminiscent of ones that can be found inside toaster ovens in lieu of plates, these burgers aren't messing around. There are no garnishes or fancy flowers to distract from the main attraction.  The burger beckons at you to eat it.   Being Valentine's Day, my hubs and I didn't know what to expect. We were relieved to find plenty of parking, but were disenchanted to find such a long line inside. Ah ha! One of those "walk up to the counter and order" places. In order to allow for adequate timing of seating, and preventing those annoying seat savers from monopolizing the grounds, your table is assigned conveniently while you're in line. While looking at the menu you're handed while getting in line, you can also order drinks from the bar since it's on the right side. I didn't hesitate to try my Skinny Dip cocktail. Having a mini coronita upsidedown in a large margarita glass filled with frozen alcohol just seemed appropriate when the temps were starting to rise outside.   The Prime time burger was delicious. I couldn't really tell the difference though between the Akaushi beef versus other types of beef. You can't really go wrong with Truffle Aioli, steak sauce, and Brie cheese. The caramelized onions ever so sweetly caressed the beef and Brie. It seemed like a match made in Heaven.   The Diablo seriously packed some punch with some bites that were super spicy. My hubby said that it was one of the spiciest burgers that he's ever had and he the type to enter spicy food eating competitions and win them. He did go on to say that although it was super spicy, he loved it because he felt that it was "just right." He always complains that other places claim that a menu item is spicy and doesn't pull through. From his words, you can count on this one to taunt your taste for burn and flavor simultaneously.   We shared the truffle fries, but although very flavorful, they weren't quite "truffly" as one would expect. I guess that was good though, because the side didn't over power the burgers we had. I also plan to order the red velvet shake next time because that just sounds awesome doesn't it? My vote is that they add alcoholic shakes to their menu too because that would be phenomenal!
4 Excellent buyers!  Service was very good.  The fries reminded me of mom's.  Size of burger was perfect.
5 I fell in love today and that lover's name is Hopdoddy.   From the get-go, one will notice their unique concept of ordering your food in line, and then seating yourself. Self-service ice water w cone-shaped cups are effectively placed for folks waiting in line. Samples of frozen margarita are generously offered to patrons. One server looked at my leg brace and crutches and told me to take a seat and my food/drink will be ordered sitting!! That is creating a great customer experience in my book!!  The ambience is hep-cat and cool w tunes from B Marley, Fleetwood Mac, etc washing over you.  Staff has genuine smiles and fab attitudes. They seem to "want" to be there working.  Had a medium burger w cheese - so scrumptious! Truffle/parm fries were well-seasoned and served cone-style. Margarita was perfect blend!
3 Not anything special. $30 for two burgers, 2 sodas, large fries. Burgers are ok, I liked the fries. I still prefer in and out over this place. I find it awkward to stand in line to place my order when they have servers. Why not sit down and take my order? People were not sure who was in line or who was waitin for a drink at the bar. It was cool to try but I probably won't go back.
5 A++ Burger Joint!  Dropped by and the place was hoppin, pun intended. Several hosts at the door quickly recognized it was our first time by the somewhat confused look on our faces. They handed us menus, pointed out the large counter bar, and escorted us past it towards the back where you order your meal. You're given a table number and are challenged to find it. Don't worry, it's not too tough.  I ordered the Goodnight Burger and well, good night and get out, it was pretty darn amazing. I'll spell it out for you:  Angus Beef, Tillamook Cheddar, Hickory BBQ Sauce, Caramelized Onions Sliced Jalapenos & Sassy Sauce  The beef is unbelievably tasty with a great texture and cooked to a recommended medium/medium wellness. Don't be afraid of the jalapenos if you're heat-averse, they really add more taste than spice. I thought the fries were ok, but the burger is where it's at.   Aside from the beef, you'll find a large selection of craft beer and real sugar sodas. The staff is super friendly and made the whole experience a good one. My only complaint is that there isn't a location closer to Tempe/Chandler, otherwise you'd have to pull me away.
5 What a rad joint! Love the look and appeal of everything at this place from the design elements all the way down to the chipotle katchup mmmm hmmm delicious. I got the buffalo bill burger with fries and an icy cold schooner of beer. Everything that came out with our order looked amazing and delicious   Staff was rad and everything about this place was unique and different.
5 In my continual quest for a great hamburger, I discovered this place via Yelp. I have visited 16 out of 20 of GQ's top Hamburgers and I have to say that this place is better than several of them. I would definitely put it on my list of top 20 hamburgers in America. I sat at the bar and I would recommend that if there are seats at the bar, grab them. It is better than standing in line.
5 Ever order at the counter at Wild Flower or Pei Wei, only to find there is no where to sit down? This hip new burger bar takes counter service to the next level. Staff, wearing T-shirts with slogans like "because your mine, I walk the line" greet you in line, and hand you a ticket with your reserved table number. Want a specific table? No worries, they will save it for you.   The special of the day was a "Boris" which piled tender pastrami and juicy sour krout on top of a tasty chicken burger. It came on a super soft freshly baked bun with lettuce, tomato and onion for $9. Fries were $3 more but they were thin, crispy and had bits of parsley mixed in. Very tasty.   The drink options include choices like Blueberry Root  giving their self service fountain a fun twist but there is a single Diet Coke option hidden among the more adventurous flavors. (I found this out when in a panic I asked a passing bus girl "what if I just want a Diet Coke?!" and she replied "then you push the Diet Coke button")  The milk shake flavors go way beyond strawberry, chocolate and vanilla with options like Red Velvet and Sea Salt Caramel. I actually tasted chunks of sea salt in mine! There is no $5 value menu here. The total for a burger, fries, soda and shake came to just over $20, for one person, but it was enough to share which I did. What? did you really think I ate all that by myself? Don't answer that.  PS I saw an interesting drink go by on a tray, which looked like a frozen margarita with a full upside down Corona bottle sticking out of it. Turns out it was exactly what it looked like. It is called a Skinny Dip. Apparently the beer empties into your glass as you drink your margarita. Hmmm might have to "share" that one next time....
4 The system for ordering- you line up and go through cafeteria-style- is kinda weird, BUT you can circumvent that by sitting at the bar.   We tried the classic burger and the "Llano Poblano" with the regular fries. The burgers are juicy and cooked right with good beef flavor. I was glad to see they are not asking $10+ for all of their burgers, just one of them.  The fries are pretty good and there's enough for two unless you're in a gluttonous mood.  The highlight of the meal was their $5 milkshake- the caramel sea salt. I'm asked weekly to go back for one.
2 What kind of restaurant makes u wait in line OUTSIDE like a night club??!! Good thing it's not 110 outside. But the door guy swears people will!  This girl will not in the summer, no matter how good the food is
5 The best turkey burger and chocolate shake I have ever had! Great food and decent prices.
5 Legit contender to the burger wars. As far as I know, at this time, this location is the only one outside of Texas. And it is very good.   Order in a line, get assigned a table, go grab your drink and sit at said table. They will find you and bring you your food. awesomely simple and efficient. My Mushroom Burger was very good, incredibly juicy. Wife had a Kale salad with a well seasoned and absolutely delicious turkey burger patty. I was surprised how tasty the turkey was and this hard core beefivor would actually consider one next time. Parmesan truffle fries were an incredible addition as was the vanilla bean and cinnamon shake. Just wow. The shakes alone might be worth the trip.  Great casual/hip environment, lots of craft beer choices, full adult bar libations, organic items as much as they can be found locally.... This place is a hit. Definitely now in our monthly rotation. #loveit
4 The ordering/table system is a little odd and confusing but the staff is friendly and helpful. When you first arrive you are greeted and handed a menu and then you stand in line to order. Next, while in the line, you are given a piece of paper with a table number and a table is reserved for you. Finally you order. The cashier seemed a bit annoyed with our questions but wasn't too off putting.   I ordered the "goodnight" which had jalapenos, grilled onions, BBQ sauce, cheddar cheese, lettuce and tomato.  The burger was cooked perfectly to my liking and wasn't the slightest bit dry (which is rare since I like my burgers cooked well done). The only complaint I had about the burger is the BBQ sauce is basically ketchup and I did not like it at all, so that kinda ruined the burger for me.  My boyfriend ordered the "Llano Poblano" which had poblanos, pepperjack cheese, bacon and he added avocado. As usual his was the better order. His was cooked nicely, as well.  We ordered the green chile con queso fries and those were amazing! The queso is served on the side for dipping and has the perfect  chile to cheese flavor! He ordered a beer and liked it while I ordered a fountain drink and was surprised (pleasantly) that they didn't have the typical brand drinks. I got a prickly pear flavored drink and it was good, I think I liked the color so therefore it made the drink better (it's hot pink).  Overall the food was good and the service was friendly. We will be back next time we're in Scottsdale and have a burger craving!
4 Great burgers, fries, shakes.  Tuna burger is outstanding, though it's helpful to know beforehand that it's seared on the outside and raw throughout.   Why in the world can't they take take-out orders over the phone.  Silliness.
4 Walked in really unsure that I wanted to try their food. Seemed to much like a Scottsdale bar to be a good burger joint. Have to say that after a couple minutes I was surprised that I was wrong. Staff was friendly and helpful. The burger options were pleasant and the food was fantastic. A little pricey to be a place to go to often but I will be back.
4 Oh. My. Gosh. You have got to try this joint!!! The mushroom burger with goat cheese and pesto is amazing. So are the fries!!! Gotta get the Oreo shake too. The decor is hip and they use all local products. If you want a good burger, eat here!!!
4 Best milkshakes. Oreo and salted caramel are my favorite, but I've tried them all, and all are delicious!  Ambience is great. Casual and hip.   Burgers are great. They're are many options for everyone, including vegetarian and non read meat options that sound fantastic.   Servers are friendly and readily available when needed.
4 Nice array of upscale burgers & funky milkshakes, with a full bar loaded with local craft beers? Umm... yes, please. My daughter's favorite new joint. Went there last night with the extended family and a friend. My Goodnight burger was just as I ordered it, juicy & delicious, the bbq sauce and sauteed onions were a great blend. Helpful hint -- add bacon. Always. To everything. Fries were crisp, salty and lightly herbed. Family enjoyed their Lamb burger, Ahi Tuna "burger", Llano Poblano and entree salad (?). Four Peaks Hop Knot on draft or San Tan Hop Shock; both great. Solid service, lively atmosphere. A great all-around time.
4 I went there when I was in arizana I got the buffalo hamburger It was amazing. The service was great. There soda could be change to coke, sprite. It was very welcoming.
4 The La Bandida is a must have; the color is a little off but don't let that fool you! My boyfriend got the Chili Burger with Fritos and gave it a gold star as well. We were able to share the regular size fries between two people no problem. The beers were a bit pricey and came in a margarita type glass which definitely affected the taste of my watermelon ale. I'd recommend to a burger lover!
4 Getting burgers and beers can get a bit pricey for this gourmet burger joint, but the food is downright delicious. They have a surprisingly impressive selection of local craft beers including Phoenix Ale and Fourpeaks. Also they serve them in ridiculous-sized margarita glass-like glasses. I got the Terlingua Burger that was amazing! Angus beef with chili & fritos! So personally I find this place perfect for a slightly elevated weekend lunch date lol.
4 I went to Hopdoddy yesterday with a few friends. I was excited to try this place since it is associated with the Salty Sow, which is fairly delish. Also, I had a coupon, so I was excited about that as well. I got to the restaurant later than my friends, so they told me to just sit at the table and they would come take my order instead of having me order at the counter. All of the employees were friendly and accommodating. I ordered a goodnight burger, sassy sauce on the side (sassy sauce is like a mayo, horseradish, and mustard concoction) with a fried egg on top and a pretzel nutella shake.... so pretty healthy. The shake was awesome. I don't typically like or order shakes, but this one was a good mix of salty and sweet. I only drank half and brought the other half home for later enjoyment. The burger was good, but super messy. It had a mess of onions, bbq sauce, cheese, and egg on it.... things were falling out all over the place. This place could use more sturdy buns for their more messy burgers. Anyway, the flavor was good and overall I enjoyed it. Also, the price was right at only 7$ for the burger and 1$ for the egg (wow, way less than expected), 5.50 for the shake (but worth every penny....). I would come back if I were in the neighborhood.
3 The atmosphere is very up beat and modern The fries are amazing. I had the llano pablano burger it had good flavor but too many competing ingredients. I even took off the bacon and it still was too much. The descriptions of the burgers all sound good but very rich and heavy. It seems like they are adding way too many flavors together  The staff are super friendly and helpful.  I like the ecofriendly attitude and of course the full bar with lots of local beers.  I would come again but order the basic burger and add on my own choices !
5 My new favorite burger place!! The pablano burger is awesome, and the truffle fries are amazing as well. The green chili queso is fantastic too. The employees are super friendly and helpful. Very cool atmosphere. I would recommend to anybody.
5 Bison burger was awesome! Cooked exactly as I had asked. Must try is the green chile queso with fries!  They have a wide variety of burgers to choose from including Tuna and lamb. Definately the burger spot in Scottsdale
2 One word: overpriced. Another three: Glorified fast-food. So you order like a fast-food/take out joint, then take a seat and they bring you your food and make a token "everything ok" stop. The milkshakes were to-die for (literally, probably shortening your life span by a few weeks due to the sheer fat & calorie count).  The burgers were pretty good, the "not-to-be-missed" truffle fries were over-exaggerated IMHO. Loud music, uncomfortable seats. Won't be in a hurry to go back.
3 In-N-Out is better.
4 I have been wanting to try Hopdoddy for a while now, but never seemed to have the time. When I finally did, and after some good words by a fellow Yelper, I found myself driving there pronto. I arrived with my husband in tow around 7:30pm on a Tuesday evening. I had heard how a line will form outside, but we were lucky and there wasn't a line or a long wait. An employee (hostess?) opened the door for us and we asked about making a to-go order. She told us to sit at the bar, as that would be faster than waiting in line. Luckily, there was open space at the bar and we sidled up to look at the menu. The bartender was extremely nice, helpful, and friendly. He was very accommodating when we told him we had a to-go order.   We ordered The Classic and the Llano Poblano with a side of parmesan fries. The shake of the day was Tiramisu and sounded yummy, so we ordered one of those as well. Our shake was ready before our food, so we tucked in with two large straws. Mmm, it was really thick and creamy. I really enjoyed the espresso flavor but the crumbled up lady fingers were a little on the crunchy side. By the time we finished our shake, our food was ready and we were on our way.  We took the burgers home and dug in. The hamburger was extremely tender and perfectly cooked at medium. I really enjoyed how flavorful it was and can't wait to go back and try the mushroom burger. The parmesan fries, which the bartender raved about, where meh. The fries themselves were good, but the addition of parmesan and the side of special parmesan sauce wasn't worth $6.50. (The regular fries were $2.75! Definitely a better deal.) The burgers were relatively inexpensive as well, around $7-9 (depending on extras/add-ons).   Overall, I am very impressed and think I have found a new favorite burger place. I have been craving Hopdoddy all week and can't wait to go back!
4 Tried take out again. Still great food, but their system simply can't handle take out well.  Saw a few tables who ordered after me, get food before me.  I didn't have a complex order either.  Stick to eating in, and it'll be great.
4 Solid burgers and fries! Love that they give you the options to mix and match the type of protein with the different topping options.   The only downside is the price. They are pretty expensive for a burger, but definitely worth a try!
4 Good burgers, locally grown foods, great service and strong drinks. Isn't that all you really need to know when it comes to a burger bar? You want the facts.  Plain and simple.    My recommendation is that you let yourself branch out here and go wild with a burger you think you wouldn't normally order. Ask for the sauce you think you wouldn't like to be put on the side so you can give it a go but not have to worry about it being all over your burger if you don't end up liking it. They have a lot of options here and you'll need to go back a few times to really get a feel for what will become your "usual" but that's the fun part about a burger bar, right!?  The fries are a perfect option for sharing between two or three people - I wouldn't try to share with more, you may end up ending relationships over an order of fries and who wants that.  So, if you love this place so much, why four stars instead of five you ask? Well. I have to agree with the other reviewer that said that the logistics of navigating this place can be a touch confusing on your first go. If it's really busy you'll wait outside, to get a chance to wait inside.  Then you'll get someone that'll walk up to you and hand you a number to give to the cashier when you finally get up there. You'll order and they'll tell you to find that randomly assigned table number somewhere in the restaurant...so now you get to wonder around a bit to find your table.    Once all that is over though, you'll have good eats and now you'll know how things work next go round and be ready for the shenanigans.
4 Yes. Yes. Yes. Burgers.  Beer.  Hormone and antibiotic free prime angus beef ground fresh daily, fresh-cut Kennebec fries, buns baked from scratch, local greens (when available) and 20 plus different breweries on tap.  It's a dream for burger inamoratos.  The burger choices are as varied as the beers on tap, such as the "Greek" with lamb, feta, cucumber, tzatziki and the "Buffalo Bill" with bison, bleu cheese, and Frank's hot sauce - but for a purist like myself I enjoyed the "Classic".  And what a flavorful, incredibly juicy burger this was.  The patty alone stood beautifully and proudly on its own, the secret Sassy Sauce gave it an extra kick of flavor alongside the fresh lettuce tomato and onion - but this meat being so full of flavor I could have enjoyed it by itself.  The deluge of deliciousness doesn't end there, though.  The parmesan truffle fries are outstanding, the truffle aoli alone should receive an award, there are lovely salads such as Baby Kale and Spinach Arugula, and you have to complete your meal with a hand-spun shake of either Stout Chocolate or Caramel Sea Salt.  This place just gets it right on all fronts, where food is concerned.  I have never been a fan of walk up counter service, but the food is delivered to the tables and servers are visiting all of the tables to check on guests, offer refills, bring additional items, and make sure that all customers are happy.  The process appears pretty smooth and streamlined, despite the issue caused by long lines of people waiting to order when there are not enough staff members present to take orders.  When I think of excellent burger spots, this is the first pace that comes to mind. Just for the gorgeous taste and juicy flavor of the meat.
4 I love the atmosphere here.  Although I would say it is easiest to just hope into a set at the bar and get full service then going through the line.  Their Sea Salt Caramel milkshake is yummy.  I finished it before I even got my burger.  I got a veggie burger with a gluten free bun.  I felt like giving it a shot even though I love me some beef.  It was delicious although the gluten free bun was a little flimsy. My husband got their mushroom swiss burger and fries which he polished off with no problem.  He would go back anytime and that is saying a lot.  He has high burger standards.  I would recommend it.
5 Local beers, good price, friendly staff, and awesome atmosphere. My new favorite burger joint in Arizona. The truffle fries are a must try and the El Diablo burger with a fried egg was just the right amount of spicy for me, a little to spicy for my buddy but it was too good and he ate it all anyway.  Will return again and again.
4 Great food and drinks but whoever came up with the ordering  system needs to be publicly flogged. I've been there 4 times and had an issue every time. Stand in line, someone's sitting at your table, who do you tip. Was the server, customer set up not working? When you reinvent the wheel it better be better than what you replaced. In spite of this I keep going back because everything else is great.
5 Went there tonight and had a buffalo burger. It was fantastic, extremely juicy and flavorful. I'd also recommend the truffle fries, they were great as well.
5 (Lyrics - Foreigner - Hot Blooded)  It's at, Hopdoddy, check in and see I got my burger at a medium and rare Come on Yelpers, do you do more than star? It's at Hopdoddy, at Hopdoddy  You should read my reviews, to know what I have in mind Craft Brews you oughta know Now you taste so fine, let me order it on the line I wanna go where the milkshakes and the liquors flow  Hopdoddy Burger Bar is also part of the Salty Sow own restaurant cause that's how I got my guitar pick coupon and knew about this place!  They make their own patty and buns here! Dang.......!   I came with a friend and like most diners, you order in line and get a table number.  My friend order the Tuna Ahi Burger while I went with the Primetime, even though my heart was shooting for the Buffalo Bill - I love Bison!  Needless to say my Akaushi Beef burger was an experiment and it was okay for my palate.  I didn't really care for caramelized onions cause it really overpowered my truffle and brie cheese.  I had a hint of arugula and steak sauce.  I was really jealous of my friends Ahi Burger!  One of the best I've tasted with sweet honey wasabi and crunchy sprouts and nori chips....yummy!    Overall, food was awesome-good and the ambiance was perfect for a place to hangout for drinks.  They have many hand crafted specialty drinks plus only locally craft brew beers.  The service is on top of their game here.  Really well informed about their products and treated us with royalty.  That's an A+ in my books! - Enjoy!
4 This is a great burger spot!  They have a small dog-friendly patio, plus tons of seating inside.  The burgers were really good.  Mine was a little soggy, but delicious.  The fries are terrific.    When we went, the line was pretty long.  I would have rather sat down and waited for a server.  It was $28 for 2 burgers and 1 side ... that seems like a lot, but these aren't your average burgers, so they might just be worth it.  Enjoy!
5 Buffalo bill was the best burger I've had. The bison was cooked perfectly, with a thin line of red, keeping it juicy throughout. The bacon, cheese, and bed of greens (romaine lettuce, maybe some arugula?) just rounded it out to make an awesome burger.
4 These may be the best Burgers in Scottsdale. Great location, great atmosphere and the food is amazing.  Ordering is a little strange, but other than that a cool place to grab a bite.   You order at the cash register and they pick your table for you when you walk in. The food and drink are then delivered to your table. Anything else you want to add to the tab can be ordered at the table also. I'm assuming they do this to speed up the ticket time. (I would rather they NOT, but I guess you shouldn't complain about food coming out Fast.)   Bar area seems to be a great place to be, and the booths and table give you a great vantage point. No desserts here except for milk shakes so be ready for that. I had the Goodnight Burger, medium. Perfectly cooked, seasoned great and the bun was everything you need in a great Burger. (the sassy sauce is to die for also)  I would give this place 5 stars if the ordering was done like a regular spot, but 4 stars is for sure solid.
5 I don't usually review places immediately after I visit them but I had to with Hopdoddy. Everything about the place was great.   I have been looking for a new, really good, burger joint for a while and this is definitely on the top of my list. Their menu is simple yet still has plenty of delicious choices. I ordered the "Goodnight" burger with a side of fries, and it was so delicious I immediately wanted another one. The burger was cooked perfectly, every topping and condiment was just the right amount to add to the flavor, but not overpower it, and the bun that held it all together was just as delicious. Every burger is customizable with many options to fine tune its taste to your unique taste buds. Even their fries are delicious, made with kennebec potatoes, which gives them a very unique flavor. Even though I heard these type of fries are referred to as "hipster fries", I still find them delicious. ;-)  The overall atmosphere is very modern and laid back, it is definitely a place to visit for lunch, dinner, and even happy hour. They had a great selection of craft beers and yummy looking cocktails. They also make their own soda and their shakes that look amazingly delicious.  I am very happy I came across this place and look forward to many more future check-ins.
1 This restaurant has very bad handicapped access so anyone who has trouble walkiing or is in a wheelchair will have a tough time getting to the entrance. Burgers are so greasy the lettuce looks like it came from a swamp.
3 A solid burger offering to be sure but at this stage in the game it is given 'also ran' status as it fails to distinguish itself from the ever growing $7+ gourmet burger field.  I share the sentiment about the order/set up system.  Also feels more FoxRC and less Austin which is kind of disappointing considering that Scottsdale would be well served by giving up some of its rhino-plasticized pretense in favor of a willingness to 'keep it weird' or authentic.
4 I am always looking for good burger places, and it makes me happy when I find a decent one just a few miles down the road.  My new work-from-home schedule has recently allowed me to try more of the spots in my neighborhood, and I have already visited this one twice.  Possibly the most awesome thing about Hopdoddy is they're all about quality, and that is reflected in something as simple as their fountain drinks.  Coke or Pepsi?  Nope.  They have Maine Root, the purveyors of one of the finest ginger beers around.  Inexplicably, they have pretty much every Maine Root soda besides the ginger brew, but they have other fine offerings besides.  I don't remember which burger I had my first visit, but it was fantastic, and cooked a perfect medium rare.  Next visit, I had the Greek, because I love lamb burgers, but this one tasted too much like a salad for my taste.  Still decent, but not a top-notch lamb burger.  The truffle fries, as well as the regular kennebec fries, are pretty good.  I'm not about to declare this place the best burger joint in the city, but it's definitely worth an occasional visit if you're in the area.
5 They consistently deliver the best burger in a market dominated by burger joints. Try the Prime Time for one that has enough great flavor without overpowering the underlying patty. We waited 50 minutes the other night, but good things one to those who wait.
5 This place is awesome! Great burgers and great beer! The burgers are unique and delicious! I love the fact that they use local farms and local brewery's! I would highly recommend this place. I cant wait to go back!
4 Good burger?  Oh HELLS YES!  Had dinner there Sunday night after picking a friend up at the airport. I arrived late, so missed all of the ordering hub-bub (but it does look super confusing to me - I don't understand how they 'assign' you a table while you're at the counter placing your order. How do you know where to go?).   Moving past that part.... my burger was waiting for me when I got there. If was PERFECT. Cooked perfectly, super tasty and left me wanting more! (Not because I was hungry but because it was so good, um HELLO super yummy yellow sauce) The fries were tasty, too.   Didn't have the space in my calorie count that day for a shake, but we'll be back. Definitely will be back.  Gave them 4 stars because their ordering/sitting process seems stupidly more complicated than it should. The concept doesn't make sense at all, and then seeing where the counter is located (passed the bar and into the back of the restaurant) it makes even less sense. The staff were all VERY nice, or at least the ones that I saw at the table.
4 I'm a fan. Good burgers, fries and a nice selection of unique natural "Maine" sodas. The root beer is amazing. I have eaten the Llano Poblano and the Goodnight burger (minus the bbq sauce) and both were outstanding. They grind their own meat, bake their own buns, and support local and small farmers. The first visit my burger was a little under done for my taste so I order well-done now. I think if you don't specify it will be a little red/bloody just fyi.  They do have some daily specials and some happy hour (2-6pm or so) specials. Not sure if they have a kids menu but they do make some yummy looking shakes! Try it out, I think you will like it.
2 The burgers are great, shakes are delicious... The truffle fries are Tid bits that required a fork, looked like they drained the fryer and gave us what was at the bottom. The service was HORRIBLE and servers need a lesson in Hospitality 101. Good luck in North Scottsdale Hopdoddy
5 Dude!!! Beer while you wait in line to order! Cain sugar sodas! A great staff! And a very good menu! Definitely coming back.
5 This place is on point! Amazing burgers. Awesome beer. Great vibe. Waited a while, but that is to be expected for good food and cold drinks on a Friday night.
5 Great atmosphere, good service and great burgers.  The selection is great or make your own.
4 Ate lunch there today rate almost 4stars! Burger was good but no enough onions and cheese and bacon didn't jump out at me! Fries good better than average. Great comfortable and great service! Malts looked great but didn't try one! Will try again when I return in October !
3 Great fresh burgers perfectly cooked. Everything is Al a Carte and the (small portion of) fresh fries are delicious.. The long line snakes around the front is like waiting for a ride at Disney...and moves just as slowly. I just couldn't figure out why.  You are funneled past the bar so you can order your drinks while shuffling towards burger heaven. If they cleaned and bussed the tables promptly maybe that would speed things up a bit. The waitress assigned seating system is confusing the first time but seems to work.  Definitely a great burger, in a fun atmosphere. The biggest drawback? The machine they use to make the handmade shakes sounds like a dentist drill...and its running 95% of the time! Its right by the ordering counter so gets louder and louder as you (slowly) approach. Makes my teeth ache just thinking about it LOL
4 Really unique take on burgers here!  Different ingredients for setting up your burger to your tastes and everything was fresh.  Had a large watermelon ale to wash down my delicious burger and my wife had a yummy milkshake to go with hers.  Was very disappointed with the service however after getting seated.  Had to ask two different people about my wife's milkshake before it was finally brought out.  Im sure it was just our situation but still unhappy about it.  Overall, the food was great and people were friendly.  Nice dining atmosphere and plenty of parking outside.  Didn't have to wait long to get a table because we went for a late lunch.  Would definitely try this place again.
2 Yea, it's different. Seating was comfortable. My medium rare burger took forever so I finally asked the server hovering to check on it. He told me he sent it back because he thought it was undercooked. Finally came out medium well ( no pink at all). Was happy to eat it and leave instead of waiting  for a third burger. Fries needed the oil changed but, were edible. Self serve drink station was far from where we we seated, might wanna rethink that. Condiments only available in small thimble cups  and far as well.    Overpriced and underwhelming.
5 We had a great burger experience here!  I read other reviews and even though I was discouraged by the line, my husband wasn't and so we waited. We were encouraged by a passing waiter to sit at bar and was I glad we did!  (Although the line moved so quickly we didn't really get a jump ahead of any other orders.). I was excited to see so many local AZ beers on tap and hubby LOVED the fresh margarita with no premix.   I chose the black bean burger. The goat cheese was a good cheese, but I'm not that into " really goaty" quality, so next time I'll order pepper Jack and be thrilled. Hubby got the bison burger,hesitating because they're typically dry. This one was fabulous!    I love this concept. I get that it's not really kid friendly without a kids' menu, but that's not important to me. It turned into a spontaneous date night with hubby instead, without rug rats running around!
5 WOW really really great burgers.  Been looking for a place since arriving in Scottsdale and found it.   Truffle fries were awesome and aioli was to die for.  Can't wait to return again and again.!
2 The food was very mediocre and at these expensive prices I just can't give a good review
3 Burgers were good but not great.  Service was just fine.   Their concept of getting a beer while waiting in line is kind of gitchy but we bought into the concept and actually enjoyed it.   We weren't overwhelmed but will try again.
3 Hey Hop Doddy, You're great 90% of the time, but last night was not the best experience. Two quick notes:  1) After waiting for 20 minutes and being at the head of the line, the hostess or seater tried telling us that they were all out of inside seating. I told them we would wait and then counted three empty booths inside. Don't try to make a customer who has waited their turn sit in the heat (yes, even with misters), if there are open tables. That's dishonest and unfair.   2) After resolving the whole table debacle there was still another wait because one of the cashiers left and was chatting and laughing with other staff members for a good five minutes (with the line practically out the door).   Show you deserve and know how to handle your popularity. Don't seat outside unless you have to when it's over 95 degrees. And communicate with your staff that the dinner rush is not the time for breaks. Just suggestions, other than that, keep up the good work.
5 Gluten friendly! They make their own gluten free buns as well as gf fries! The burgers are top notch. Killer flavor combinations. We tried the Parmesan truffle fries which were decadent and a caramel sea salt milkshake which I am still dreaming about. The set up is efficient and the staff friendly and very helpful. Do yourself a favor and try this fantastic burger bar!
5 "Cerveza Rita" - nuff said. This is our favorite restaurant in Scottsdale. Great atmosphere, great food, easy to get to location and friendly staff. LOVE the fresh meat they serve! I'm telling you, there's a difference between janky tyson meat and the fresh ground beef and bison they serve at this joint. Top notch!
5 My favorite place to grab a gourmet burger in Phoenix/Scottsdale. No doubt about it, Hopdoddy is tough to beat.  At first, the setup is strange, but the more I thought about it it makes sense. You are required to stand in line to order your food, all the while standing by the bar and beer taps. At first awkward, however, the move is genius. For all of us beer fiends out there, this is your perfect chance to order a brew and sip on it in line while cashing out at the bar.  Secondly, while you're in line they bring around samples of their milkshakes. "Do you want a free sample of our vanilla bean milkshake?" Uhhh, yes I do, thank you very much.   Third, the burgers are awesome. Perfectly sized and cooked just right, they come a-la-carte and you're going to have to order your fries separately, but they're large enough to share. My go-to when I'm at Hopdoddy is the Goodnight Burger (add bacon and make it a "Great"night), with the truffle fries. Do yourself a favor and pick up some of their homemade BBQ sauce for dipping, its delicious. Don't forget to follow everything up with their salted caramel milkshake. They give you an extra large straw so you're almost guaranteed to get a brain freeze - totally worth it.  The great thing about the madness of ordering through the line when you first arrive is that you get a "server" to take care of you once you've sat down and when you're done eating you've already paid (unless you got dessert or another beer - womp womp)! You can wipe the burger off your face and peace out whenever you like, no waiting on a check.  I highly, highly recommend Hopdoddy Burger Bar when you're looking for some bomb burgers to stuff in your face.
3 The soda machine is awesome great flavors ... The hamburger was overcooked not bad but over cooked I was told medium rare it came out medium... Flavors aren't bad on the burger but overall it's just mediocre ..
3 Big fan ... I go quite a bit however .. it is not always consistent and I hate the ordering system. Too many times are people waiting in line when there are tons of open tables... and in this heat, you want to be served.. not wait in line especially at those prices
5 Best burgers! The Primetime Burger is amazing (Brie cheese, arugula, carmelized onions, steak sauce). I also love their kale salads and milkshakes. The service is always great.
4 Not a fan of their ordering system, come in order at a counter then sit down for delivery. Would have much preferred to sit down and order like at a normal restaurant.  Burgers were extremely tasty as was the gourmet style milkshakes.  Sodas are not your typical coke/pepsi products but vanilla cream, etc.  Has a small bar with a small selection of microbrewed beer but nothing really to write home about.  Dog friendly patio.
1 Terrible impression from the start. Staff are young kids that aren't concerned with happy customers. It's not a traditional restaurant set up, I'd liken it to a McDonalds experience. If you like standing in line and serving yourself a soft drink at the soda fountain then you will love it. I was expecting to be seated and have a waiter...this is NOT that kind of place. Food overall was ok at best. I had a salad and hubby had the Diablo burger and truffle fries. His burger had a good spice. The beef didn't have a good texture. Our fries were hard and not even hot. The kale salad was ok. With all the great burger places in the valley, I wouldn't repeat this mistake.
5 Stopped in for lunch yesterday and I am hooked.  Sat at the bar which was full service.  First, the bartender we had was great.  Always kept our drinks full.  Had good suggestions on food as well.  The burgers were great.  My girlfriend got the black bean burger and was a fan.  I went for the Buffalo Bill and it was great.  Bison burger cooked perfectly with hot sauce and blue jack cheese.  Also, I definitely recommend the fries with green chili queso.  Burgers were great, but the green chili queso may have been the best part. Ended the meal with a salted caramel shake that was made perfectly.
5 I love this place! Such a fun environment, the bar has good options and I personally love that their is a burger that donates money to charity (its called the goodnight, SO YUMMY) I also cant go to this place without getting a milkshake! I would recommend Hopdoddy to anyone looking for good food and good people!
4 Absolutely one of the best burger places I  been, awesome local Beers. The El Diablo burger rules, beware super hot! You'll $&@$ fire and save matches!!!
4 I'm not one to crave a burger very often but if I did, I would definitely come here. There has been a line out the door the 2 times I have been there, but I was not in a rush so didn't mind.  They assign you a table right before you're about to order and I've been lucky each time as to get a "private" table, since they sometimes seat you at a table where other people are seated and put some BS divider on the table to give the illusion you are separated. All that does is prevent you from looking at the person's food who you are sitting right next to. You are still sitting next to them and can see them clearly so don't see how that helps anything.  Moving on. I had The Goodnight burger because the carmelized onions, jalapenos and sassy sauce (assumed it was the house sauce and was right) caught my eye. I really like the bun they use too. Delicious! I favor light beers so tried the one from Grand Canyon Brewing Co. and I loved it. This will definitely be my beer of choice when I return.  I absolutely hated the milkshakes. Ordered a chocolate one and it was so bad that I asked to switch it for a different flavor which they did with no problems at all. I got the vanilla and it was just as bad as the chocolate. There's some kind of weird cinnamon number on it and it tastes awful.  Definitely stick to the burgers and beer combo!  The staff is very young but very nice and professional.
5 Very cool vibe here.  Order from the counter, and then they bring your order, and quickly!  We noticed that there was provision for a long line and ice water outside, as well as a notice that tables were reserved for those in the line, so we imagined that it could be crowded, but not at 3:00 on a Wednesday afternoon!  We both tried local brews, which we later learned were not included in the Hoppy Hour prices, but that was okay.  Served in an icy footed goblet, my wife tried the San Tan Epicenter and I wanted to taste the Phoenix Ale Watermelon, which neither of us felt had a fruity taste, so it was fine too.  My wife went for the Llano Poblano Burger, which she pronounced a winner and muy delicioso, and I was attracted to the Goodnight Burger because $1 of the price went to a local charity--plus it had fresh jalapenos on it!  Both were outstanding and almost too juicy!  We shared a large order of truffle Kennebec fries, and they were so good by themselves that we didn't use the accompanying sauce because they were perfect as is.  A really cute place, service was great, and next time I want to try one of their renowned milk shakes (like raspeberry white chocolate cheesecake or Nutella!)  We will be here again next year!  Reasonably priced as well.
4 I've dined here for over a year now, and I don't know why I haven't written a review yet!  I gave up sitting at the booths- I don't like lining up to order.  I just saddle up to the bar and get quick service there.  Aside from creating my own burger, I can only order one of their twelve crafted burgers without having to omit key ingredients.  All of the rest either have sauces that contain cornstarch, or corn syrup (sassy and steak sauces), too hot to even consider (El Diablo), or have items I am allergic to.  Yes, I can ask for them to omit these items, but then all that is left is the burger patty and bread!  So it's the Llano Poblano for me. http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/hopdoddy-burger-bar-scottsdale?select=lAFmVsT17iI25nVUvualDg#lAFmVsT17iI25nVUvualDg  A bit greasy due to the grilled poblano and slices of bacon, but very delicious!  The brioche is nice, but I'd like to try it with whole wheat next time.  (If I should ever feel like going for The Classic, I might as well wait for it to go on special-- classic burger and soda for $10, but I'd sub something else for the soda.)  I also tried the delicious Peach Cobbler milkshake special, which goes off the specials board this Sunday to make room for a new selection.  If you like peaches and pies, then you will LOVE this.  Peach puree and marinated peaches (in triple sec, I'm told), homemade caramel sauce, and pie crust** mixed in Hopdoddy's vanilla ice cream base.  Go and get some before it's too late!    Oh, and many thanks to Jesse for delivering on my request for ice-cold Oak Creek Nut Brown. http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/hopdoddy-burger-bar-scottsdale?select=DBsmT8GBMoxGjQgo_Qs9kA#DBsmT8GBMoxGjQgo_Qs9kA  I only enjoy beers when they're so cold there are ice crystals in them.  Check back for the photos, which I'll add in a few days.  The frosted glass was gorgeous!  **Made especially for this milkshake.  Hopdoddy's dessert menu only features milkshakes and nothing else.  I really enjoy the one made with Nutella and chocolate-covered pretzels!
5 So, this place is really fun. You walk in get handed a menu and wait in line. While you're in line they walk around with all kinds of samples of their food and answer questions about the menu. After you pay, you get seated and wait for your food. I got the prime time burger with the garlic Parmesan cheese fries and it was delicious! Parking was relatively easy and it was moderately crowded. The atmosphere is really casual which I love. The only cons I would say is the noise level. I'm not sure if I'm getting old or what but I had a hard time communicating with my hubby over the music and crowd. Other than that service was great and we will be back for sure :)
4 My husband and I have added Hopdoddy to our rotation of favorite restaurants.... not a good thing for our waistlines, but it's worth it.   We usually start by splitting the spinach/arugula salad, then he gets the Classic Burger while I love the Goodnight burger, along with a shared small order of fries.  Consistently excellent, every single time, and consistently delicious - quite possibly the best burgers we've ever had.   Realize we could make it a bit healthier by each of us ordering a salad first and then sharing a burger and skipping the fries, but our good intentions always seem to cave right as we're giving our order.  Maybe next time : )   My husband LOVES the cold beers; wine list is okay but could benefit from a bit of an upgrade.  The only thing I really don't like about this restaurant is the ordering system.   Like many other people have commented, we figured out early on to just sit at the bar so we don't have to stand in line, and since we avoid peak hours, we're usually able to get a seat.  Even so, it's not as comfortable as a table/booth would be, and while the bartenders are very attentive, there's not a whole lot of ambience - especially when you're looking at a line of people on the other side of the bar waiting to place their order.   The whole set-up just seems very odd, very awkward, and very inconvenient..... just kind of a crummy way to start what is otherwise a great dinner out.   Also seems a bit odd to have milkshakes offered as a dessert.... the ONLY item offered as dessert.   Just as well, I guess, that there isn't a more interesting/enticing selection to choose from, given how many calories we've already ingested up to that point; it just seems like a bizarre choice to have as your one and only dessert.    Having said all that, what do I know - obviously their formula works, because the place is consistently packed.   If I was reviewing it strictly on their salads and burgers, I would definitely have given it a full five stars, and I don't doubt that's the secret to their success - consistently top quality, delicious food.   The inconvenience of the ordering system isn't enough to keep us away.   We just ate there last night and I'm already anticipating our next visit!
5 Favorite burger spot in Scottsdale, hands down!! First time there I tried the magic mushroom and the llano pablano... Definitely liked the magic mushroom the best but the pablano was tasty as well. Next trip there I had the prime time... Brie cheese and Carmelized onions, truffle aioli.. Need I say more? The burger was juicy and cooked to perfection! The ahi tuna burger is amazing as well but beware the nori chips are full of wasabi heat!!   The milkshakes are incredibly delish and those truffle parm fries I dream about maybe once a week!!
2 Mediocre burger at best.  Can't figure out what was strange about the meat, but tasted as if something like found pork was added.  Also, burger is not grilled.  Similar to Habit burger and Smash burger all catering to a hip crowd.  If u want hip, go to Lush. Can't compare to the burgers at AJs grill.  Try Delux or Blu Burger which is right around the corner.  All else was great:  service, bar, soda fountain (cane sugar), but didn't make up for the burger.
5 The burgers vary greatly but they're so delicious.  I never would have thought I would like a mushroom burger.  And no way am I gonna like a chicken burger.    Well I was proven wrong.  The mushroom burger was my absolute favorite followed closely by the Ahi burger and the Continental (chicken).  The beef hamburger didnt seem nearly as appealing to my palate as the mushroom or Ahi tuna burgers. French fries with a truffle aoli will give you a new found appreciation (truth here -it could be love) for French fries.    Salads are delicious, fresh, combinations of the season.   The taste of summer watermelon in a salad of baby kale.  Fantastic. Sodas from Maine that are made with pure can sugar and natural favors instead of a lot of dyes and chemicals.  Kinda makes you feel like a kid again.  BTW, i hear the blueberry soda ( yeah, bet you've never heard of that before) actually tasted like real blueberries.   And then there are some special cocktails and deliciously tempting shakes that are unique to this place too.   And the service is impressive.  The staff is knowledgeable of the menu items including the ingredients of each.   Food is delicious and different.  Service is polite, knowledgeable,  and efficient. AND prices are comparable to places like Fuddruckers. I'm already planning to bring my family here.
5 I concur with most of these reviews! Great food and service.  Shakes are unbelievably GREAT!!!! Get the one with pretzels in it, the classic sweet and salty in a milkshake.  They have turkey, chicken and veggie selections that are actually GOOD!! LOL!!  Got to talking to the server, they had 1,000 applications, hired 100 and trained them 9 days before they opened. So they know about the food and how it is prepared.  Will make it a point to stop by again in the near future!!
4 Good burgers! The classic is delish and the El Diablo is super spicy! I highly recommend the fries with green chile queso. So yummy! As for the milkshakes, I've only tried 2 so far: Nutella with chocolate covered pretzels is amazeballs and the caramel with sea salt just tasted like a vanilla shake with caramel in it. Meh.  I really like that they offer different types of sodas than you're used to seeing, all made with real sugar. Even the ketchup is made with real sugar!  Next time, I'm going for the Llano Poblano burger with roasted poblanos, pepper jack, and chipotle mayo and the Oreo shake! Yes, please!
4 Stopped in one afternoon on my way through town, and was pleasently surprised!   First ill start by stating you do wait in line to place an order, and take your number to your table whole you wait for your wait. Now, that being said, its hands down the best quality burger joint run as an ordering line. I, decided to sit in the bar and see what "hop" doddy was really all about.  Wow! Again, quality craft beer served in a nice frosted goblet! Beautifully done! Decided to try the 'La Bandito' with a side of 'Truffle Parmesan Fries' as the burgers do not come with sides.  Defiantly well worth every penny, and without a doubt will be returning when in the area!
4 Its Sunday night all our plans fizzled out and no dinner was being cooked so the only option was to hop on over to Hopdoddy (ok it wasn't the only option but who is going to argue with me?)  My party consisted of some picky eaters, my oldest daughter her 16 month old son, and my son. 1st question my son has is how do I even know where this place is at, I just answered him one does not ask these things of mom's just know I know things haha.  We walked in and checked out the menu and ordered where placed.  Daughter went with The Classic Burger plain just beef, cheese, BACON pls cooked well, that's how she rolls  Son ordered The Goodnight burger: Angus beef, cooked med rare, with Tillamook cheddar cheese, hickory bbq sauce, caramelized onions slices & jalapeno & sassy sauce, and that burger didn't last long at all, poof it was gone  After some flip flopping on what to pick I settled with the Thunderbird, it's organic chicken burger with roasted poblano chili, cheese, BACON and avocado, it's amazing with the perfect amount of heat!  Also for kicks we ordered Kennebec fries & Truffle fries, my son loved the truffle fries, said he felt fancy eating them, I enjoyed them as well!  Almost went home without a shake, but nope we ordered a few before we left, I went with the Caramel & Sea Salt Shake, this is the perfect combo of a salty sweet and great treat on a hot June night, my son went with the raspberry white chocolate and I guess it was good, he wouldn't share haha.   The El Diablo is calling me so I know I will be back soon.
5 Great... No, amazing burgers, awesome fries, you have to try the shakes, all at really surprisingly low prices!
4 This place was awesome! The hamburger was juicy and delicious. I had the, well I can't remember the one I had, but it had mushrooms and an awesome sauce on it. The Parmesan fries were delicious too. I drank their house made soda (blueberry flavor!) only like 3 refills! The staff was friendly and made sure we had everything we needed. Will definitely go back!
4 This place is amazing! The experience starts in line where friendly staff greats you, answers any questions you may have so when you get to the counter you are ready to order, oh and they reserve a table so that when your done ordering seats are awaiting. They serve beer in giant frozen glass goblets and they do have a bar, but it seems to be more of a family atmosphere! I don't think I have had a better hamburger. Their BEEF comes from traditionally raised cows with no growth hormones and they apparently buy local when available ....and did I say it is super clean.  It is expensive, which I why I gave it 4 stars, but all in all for what you get its a great place.  It is a first come first serve, so keep your party small (4) or you will get separated.
5 I *love* Hopdoddy! This is an adorable, laid back place with delicious food. (More on that in a moment!)   The setup is simple. You pony up to a single line, (while conveniently standing next to the bar), place your order and mozy out to a table that's been held for you. Family friendly yet not overwhelming. Booths abound (seating about 4ppl). Tables in the center of the restaurant can accommodate larger groups. The bar is also a great place to sit and graze.  Tip: If there's a line sit at the bar!  Happy Hour is M-Th. (2-6pm) And(!) the Doddy Deal is $9.95:  -Classic Burger w/Cheese -Kennebeck Fries + a soda (Coke or Root Beer)  No wonder there's a line to the door!  Now, for the food. There are tuna burgers in the world, and then there is the Ahi Tuna Burger at Hopdoddy. Sweet heavenly geezus, You. Must. Eat. This.  Let me repeat: Ahi Tuna. GET IT!  Por quoi? Pan seared with a robust area of pinkness. I've had the delight of biting into this burger twice. Typing this I crave it again. (It's *that* good.) Sprouts, teriyaki, honey wasabi, pickled ginger and mayo are best friends with nori chips. The crunch reminded me of stuffing potato chips into sandwiches as a child. Sushi is on par with a top of the line sushi joint. (Yeah, seriously.)  When the truffle fries came out I reached greedily for them. (My friend was not as much in love. When she said truffle fries are a competitive market I thought, "GOOD. More for me. Now move your hand.")  Jesse, our bartender, was filled with stories. Katy, a server in the dining area, is a hoot. People working at Hopdoddy enjoy what they're doing and the good vibes make the time pass.  Feel free to buy me a gift card online. You know I'll use it!
5 I love this place!! I have been here multiple times. Would recommend the buffalo bill or the el Diablo. All meats are grass fed and they use the freshest ingredients possible.  For dessert try the milkshakes...recommend the salted carmel and oreo cookie combo.
